Reading Assignment:
His legs were crippled by a disease, so the Moxx chose to travel around on a fast-moving anti-gravity chair. The chair also replaced his body fluids every twenty minutes so that he didn't sweat glaxic acid. He greeted visitors or friends by spitting in their faces.
American spend 8 billion dollars annually on cosmetics.
I wont get into the whole argument, but I found it interesting when the topic of racism in television was brought up, especially when my teacher mentioned The Bachelor. I am not a die-hard fan of this show, but I did get myself sucked in to a few seasons that had a bachelor or bachelorette that I actually found interesting, so when he mentioned this show as a racist one, I was confused.
Anxious
In those patients with mild to moderate brow bossing and thick skull bone over the frontal sinus (or are missing a frontal sinus), bone reduction by burring can be done with a nice result. When brow bossing is present but the bone thickness over the frontal sinus is thin, simple bone reduction contouring is impossible without entering the frontal sinus.
There will be lots of fun vendors, with lots of cute things! I'll be there with my friend who is selling those ADORABLE wood letters that are decorated and embellished so stinkin' cute!!! I promise you won't be disappointed if you come!
The parties responsible for the pollution at Newtown, on the other hand, are well known—ExxonMobil, BP and Chevron, along with several industrial companies along the waterfront. The city supported the designation at Newtown because there was “no other way to clean it up,” Lavorgna said.
If you want to read a little more about Stencel,
for those who have no preferences.
I would also like to share another scene. This one is from the cartoon series Avatar; The Last Airbender. It's the scene in the third "book" (what they called seasons/series') where Aang and Katara dance. It's more of a choreographed fight than an actual dance, but it still looks amazing. It was actually watching this scene that inspired me to make d "dancing".
confession 5: I am lurving black and white pictures. just because.
This is going to turn into something of a love letter, but I promise when I’m finished you’ll be just as obsessed as I am. Or you won’t. Do whatever you like.
I can’t imagine what life would be like if I had left Norfolk right after high school, or even at an earlier age. Sure I still have time to experiment and see what it is like (I can start saving now for a trip to the 2014 World Cup in Brazil), but I feel that part of my true identity would be left behind. I would just be another stranger on the sidewalk, making his way through the maze called life. To me, that would be strange . For now… let’s keep it local.
Yuck! I wrote those couple of lines above a few days ago. Nothing has changed but I don't feel as desperate as I did on Thursday. At least I don't think I do.
In this God designed place, it takes effort to keep the chain locked. Everything tells you to watch our for yourself, but it's only by linking our arms with others that we overcome! After all, breaking the chain in Red Rover means the other team is winning. Not a good strategy if you want to see victory! And I do.
- falling down stairs that have no hand-rail
1. Never leave just before someone’s almost going to kill you
More detail on the background to this decision
29. “All our dreams can come true – if we have the courage to pursue them.” –Walt Disney
They sing plenty about falling in love and falling out of love, but always with a wink that suggests they know how ridiculous it all is. In addition, they also have a political edge to them; Bacalhau speaks of the effect “Parva Que Sou” has on audiences in Portugal, telling as it does of a woman’s fight to retain her dignity and sense of purpose in an economic climate that dumps on the poor. And there are so just many songs that put a huge smile on your face – “Mal por Mal” or “Fon Fon Fon” or “Movimento perpetuo associativo” (ignore the title, they’ll have you singing along in no time), as well as ones that are so beautiful, they’ll take your breath away: I almost burst into tears at the loveliness of “Passou por mim” and I doubt you’ll find a more gorgeous song than “Clandestino” anywhere. And as for “Um contra o outro” – it has one of the catchiest choruses ever. Really. Ever.
pineapple filling – I just bought 1 packet of the readymade ones and I add a bit of hotwater to the filling, just a bit so that they won’t be too dry.
2) Contrasts
Taking no chances
So let's see
These two were my favorite floats. I love the giant turkey and the kids were thrilled to see Santa for the first time this year!
and a little more worn
My next projects are what i have created on Orlando as i visited there in 2001 and am returning again in 2012 to visit some of the places that we didnt get to first time around.
And then we divorced 25 years later. Never trust a man who doesn’t like DiCarlo’s pizza. Really.
Dad was the official icing applier. He was really good at it. Once the icing was on, it was time for some candy.
One trait that has been lost on me, however, is my dad’s scientific nature. A dentist by trade and Back to the Future’s Doc Brown at heart, Tim Harper, D.D.S. is endlessly curious about the nature of all that is best explained by biology, chemistry and physics. While I, like the narrator of Twinkle, Twinkle Little Star, might be inclined to eternally wonder exactly what role stars play in our solar system, my dad correctly identifies them as the old-as-time collections of gas that they are. Once when I was having trouble getting my printer to work, my dad suggested using the scientific method to solve the problem. As I started to laugh, I looked up, saw the earnest expression on his face and realized he was not kidding.
While you were busy focusing on Al Queda and Al Sharpton, Al Crakah tipped in an stole your pension!
/end shameless promotion
I absolutely loathe going out to eat with large groups of people, so I knew that the regular ole dining with friends deal wouldn't work for me. I wanted to do something that would be really fun and entertaining for everybody. So if you, like me, were born a performer, but your mediocre singing ability has held you back from fulfilling your total destiny as a star, then karaoke is for you.
- come back next week to party again!
So there's been a lot of time to reflect...on the goodness of others. How total strangers will be so kind and compassionate and helpful. How wonderful my dear family members and precious friends have been to think of ways to help, to encourage, and done so with a smile on their face and joy in their heart. I am blessed with amazing family and friends and will forever remember the sweetness they have brought into this otherwise drab season of life.
Individual and group entries are welcome. For more information, see us in the library and check out the New York State Archives website: http://www.archives.nysed.gov/a/grants/grants_student_sraguidelines.shtml
Most of all, look at this writing experience with an open mind. Sometimes the questions will be hard...and require some thought. That is a good thing. Other times it will be easy. You can add photos, or whatever you like to your post. It is about you after all. ~ Thanks for joining me.....I hope you enjoy this each week.
Taking Reverse Phone Lookup to your advantage is the key. Learn quickly like any other website systems. Entering a phone number is so simple indeed in getting info you need to have. Apart from considering as well the fact that it’s affordable. The simpler the better as always so why not take the easy route via this amazing system.
You get the picture. Sometimes, less is more.
“When a client comes to us and says they want to start using tablets in their business, we are quick to advise them to develop a strategy for the best and most effective usage,” said Greg Rosen, President of Ramp Up Technology, a Manhattan-based provider of technology support, IT & computer solutions, and interactive marketing. “Tablets are wonderful tools, but if they’re not used correctly based on the specific needs of a company, they can then be one of the most ineffective uses of time.”
Well, April has had other ideas.
Now here I am, ravaged, compromised, contused and stripped bare, and somebody loves me. Whether or not I was the heiress of a loving culture, family and inner worth, I now am left feeling begat of love, born of love and clueless. There’s another living, breathing, thinking, human being who voluntarily loves me. And, I’m more than okay with that.
Scientific journals will have a right to publish peer-reviewed studies, even if they are critical of products made by wealthy corporations.
He responded, “then we will, they said they would honour the tickets, don’t worry, they will sort it out,” he said, “ach, let’s get out of this stupid place.”
**The mixture will thicken as it cools. One method to test thickness of jelly is to drop a little onto a very cold surface. If the jelly does not run, then it is thick enough).
To conclude I think that in today’s time the disciples would be a 16 chavvy character whom works in somewhere like Asda who hangs around with a croup of friends at the local park! But the amazing thing is God uses there ordinary and adds his extraordinary to make them a powerful force!
Especially in the after school program, play is a great way for kids to decompress. It's a great way for them to be themselves, to pursue their interests, to work at their own pace, to solve their own problems, to disappear into a favorite book, to work out their frustrations, to learn about group dynamics. Play offers children who have limited time for recess during school to move and jump and run.
St Johns Wort:..A perennial plant with 5 petals bright yellow in appearance with small black dots. Properties:..High concentration of Melatonin. Treatments: this was until banned by the authorities used for treating depression.
My friend is absolutely right (along with R and others). This position has more holes than a sieve – even more so when one considers the very origins and raison d’être of Afrobeats. Dan Hancox again:
Months go by and I hear it come up again. Suddenly all phone calls are taken outside away from me. He becomes distant and non verbal. I start to do some research on Freemasons. I asked my pastor for his opinion and I even went to a Christian counselor. Everywhere I have turned it’s been nothing but negative feedback. My counselor told me to pray hard for him. She has family members that are involved and it’s not something for a follower of God to be involved in. Now I’m really scared. All the people who I trust are fearful for The Mr. I tell him about my fears and what I have heard and read. He becomes angry and tells me this is something he is doing regardless. A few weeks later he tells me that the advice I gave him should not have come from me it should have come from his brotherhood. Excuse me but we have always trusted and counted on one another’s opinions.
No barriers. I can’t tell you how often I see tables loaded with freebees and literature placed between sales and marketing staff and their prospects. Get the table out of the way, and engage your guests face-to-face.
After that, we went to lunch, then he had to be back with his, um, group (?), at 1pm. er, sorry, 1300 (hehehe), which lasted for 2 minutes, then we went to the Commisarry (first time!), which is the Army Grocery store (great prices, by the way), and to the PX. We looked around a little longer than we probably should have, and had to RUSH to get home in time to pick up the big kids.
Then there are the descriptions of Pale Ale picking up its distinctive flavour only after a long maturation. You know what that screams at me? Brettanomyces. What else takes so long to develop?
shellfish
It has started me thinking about other perspectives in life.
This is a video of Dinah from about three weeks ago.
[18] See Robert H. Gundry, “Salvation in Matthew,” in Society of Biblical Literature: 2000 Seminar Papers (Atlanta: Society of Biblical Literature, 2000), 402-414 for a more detailed discussion of
- 2 medium tomatoes, skinned and chopped (I didn't bother skinning them)
But before you go, I've got a little something to give away. I'm giving away 2 pezzy prints charm packs to one lucky winner. All you have to do is leave a comment. If you like, I would love to hear what you like to do with charm packs, cuz I've got a few more sitting on my table waiting for some great ideas. The winner will be drawn at random on March 23rd when I wake up. Here's a picture of all the great colors, and there are 2 charm packs for this give away.
It's not what's been replaced or added it's what still remains or- better yet- not so much what is still visible but what is invisible that pulls me back.
We rarely eat meat, (1) because it is SO expensive here on the island (no joke, for 2 chicken breast it comes to about $9.20, seriously!) and (2) because when I go to the butcher I get weirded out by the whole animals hanging there, just staring at me!!! Okay, so it is mostly because it costs so much and I get nervous when trying to speak Greek, maybe I will bring home goat liver instead of chicken. Anyway, since we don't eat meat often, I really like to substitute vegetables. Here is my version of a "Vegetarian Pastitsio" a wonderful alternative for my veggie loving friends!
After searching high and low on Pinterest and online I was quiet unsuccessful in my quest.
*Visit www.nbc.com/casting and closely follow the instructions for taping your 3- to 5-minute audition video, and send your completed application, photo, videotape and copy of your driver's license to:
06 Panic in Detroit
The original restaurant occupied the new construction which was completed about two years ago.(the part of the building that extends from the back of the property out to the sidewalk.) Gaining additional seating required expanding into the first floor of the original structure and coverting about 3/4 of the first floor to more table space.
7. When We Two Parted
It was then that I realized, regardless of the biopsy results... whatever was in my lungs, was there, the only thing that was up to me, was how I was going to deal with that.
The suggestion that Greece should be commissariata is a crude response to Greece's post-colonels' political underdevelopment. No-one could risk taking on Greek fiscal governance: apart from the unlikelihood of being any more successful than the elected Parliament at imposing fiscal restraint measures, there are no means to assert sovereign control for Greeks, never mind Germans.
Motlanthe, Dipico and other beneficiaries of the trust in effect increased their ownership of the initial holding from 10% to 50%, without spending any more money.
Put on the Brakes People!
Yes Geli dear, but as every Enron investor could attest, the past is no guide to the future. And your economy just slowed by half. And the euro is stable in the same way that rice pudding has the consistency of reinforced concrete.
MandyZ
We just need to focus.
The only thing I have left to do is replace the tap on the sink. It's very hard to control the temperature of the water with the present faucet so I will be replacing it with a two tap faucet in the future. But as there are more important things to take care of first - like painting the rest of the house - it will wait.
Well, that turned out to be a lengthy show and tell. Took up quite a chunk of my time too. Precious time. Makes me realise just how much extra time I had for creating this month since I haven't been blogging. Until next time...
If you don't like cabbage or sauerkraut this dish isn't for you. It is one of Dr. Foods favs. I love it too (hey, I just sounded like the Irish Spring commercial from when I was a kid! Uh oh, I am old.)
From Britain alone there are millions of such stories. So many young lovers torn apart never to meet again in this world, so many futures which could have been but never were, so many hopes dreams and plans which came to nothing, and in particular so many young men who sacrificed everything and died terrible deaths for the sake of their country and the love of their homeland.
But a nap would be good.
The influential religious sect Iglesia Ni Cristo will gather its flock Tuesday in what organizers described as a “Grand Evangelical Mission” or as political observers would say, “show of force.”
Plain and simple, I want the opportunity to parent a girl child. I want the bows, the frills, the tea parties, the obnoxious Barbie shoes that will mingle with the legos in my life. And darn it, I'm tired of apologizing for that desire. I want a grown up relationship with my daughter, whatever that may be. I want to see things through her eyes. I want to be the mother of the bride. I want to watch my husband with a pink bundle. To watch him dance with her. To stop being excluded from Mother/Daughter lunches, spa days, and picture options. (not that I let those terms stop me. Those who know me, know I've shown up with a boy or two in tow to picture sessions and lunches).
I know what I was thinking when I witnessed this agonizingly prolonged scene: Come on, Delphine, just say something! Don't just sit there and wallow in your own misery! Take some action and do something to fix it! And yet...I understand the impulse to wallow all too well.
Brand: Bumble and Bumble
It is only May but I have witnessed the best film of 2011 and it is 13 Assassins. The following review will contain nothing but fulsome praise for Takashi Miike’s film so brace yourselves…
Do you have silver and gold coins or bullion tucked away?
Jean’s work combines images that speak to me: the often harsh landscape of Montana, where four generations of my family have lived; images of women; the feminine and flowing lines of beautiful fabrics and clothing.
1930: 1042.5 OG
Yet memories of days gone by, will always remain within my heart.
While we recognize the ruling isn’t going to have any early impact on the multibillion dollar business of campaign finance, we still believe it is good public policy. Average Americans are powerless to stop the influence of big money in politics, but at least they can find out how it’s spent.
My ultimate intention is to reach out to everyone who works in the creative
Long ago when I was a teenager, I occasionally accompanied a relative of mine on journeys to do with his business, taking the opportunity to discover bits of the country I’d not normally have known about in the process. One regular trip was to Loughborough, and the last leg was up the A6 from Leicester. We didn’t have much time for places like Mountsorrel, a small town on the A6 that I remember as being full of grime, noise, and fumes from the cars and lorries on the main road, which carved its way straight through the centre. ‘A decayed market town,’ Pevsner called it, and no wonder. And as for the church. Well, who would bother to pay attention to a building so pulled about, patched up with brick, apparently unloved, its walls of local granite graying over with dust? Added to which, it
“Good Lord!! Have you no culture woman???? You don’t go murdering bugs and insects with Fine Wine Magazines!!”
Its an apple problem so if you run into this go do the apple store.
It's 2012 already!!! How time flies...
I got bruised and I am all sore.
Holder’s letter appeared to be part of an Obama administration effort to respond more forcefully to the growing criticism over how the suspect was detained and questioned, an issue that has caused political problems for the White House.
Have you decided to get Direct TV yet?
cook on low for 5-6 hours
He's a character . . . what can I say?
I hope you’ll go to your local ice rink and give it whirl. Have fun! Let me know how you like it!
Ironic to come into work and find an influx of folks sharing these two videos – created by a Dutch filmmaker and father. His children’s life, growth, personalities – their moments – all beautifully captured in less than three minutes. What a gorgeous tribute to his children and such an amazing way to honor this magical parenting journey. Enjoy!
Not everyone needs or wants formal instruction. Not everyone needs to be told "go practice."
Can’t wait to see what the Internet finds when it’s 80 degrees on Friday!
Calorific Diet Tracker shows your ratio vs. ideal ratio and uses a three color traffic light system to keep you aware of what you are eating and how to immediately make modifications.
I know white phones are a bit ‘ooh look at me’ but I felt like I wanted a change from the usual black colour of my Desire S. So anyway, I didn’t go for it in the end. I think I’m going to hold out and see what Samsung have to offer with the Samsung Galaxy S3 handset which will hopefully be officially announced on the 22nd May.
Paper Hearts
today through this devotional. Therefore, open your heart and receive
When we did the concerts. Especially when we sang “UGLY”, everyone was in their own world and jumping along, I was very moved by this.
-a2e
Enjoy. oh yeah, I took a slice of bread with a little bit of butter and dipped in the sauce from the pot before I cleaned it (put the meal in a container since we unexpectedly went to a movie premiere and didn't eat this for dinner) and it was great with the bread. That is so exciting to me as I am a total dipper.
Jesus’ very first disciples struggled with this. They traveled with Jesus, watched his miracles and heard him preach. They came to believe that he was God’s chosen Messiah – true God in the flesh, their only true hope for salvation and real life. And then he was killed. Now they didn’t know what to do with all their hopes and dreams. It was all over. On the third day after his death, some of these disciples went on a short journey. A stranger joined them as they walked and asked them why they seemed so sad. They told the stranger about Jesus and all he had done and said, and then they told him how Jesus had been handed over and killed. They end with a brief and poignant expression of their loss and confusion:
At the end of the semester, we had to hold a luncheon for all the faculty in our department. The recipe that I'm sharing today was given to me by the resident director of the house, so I have no idea where it originally came from. However, she said her mother had made it for years, so she suggested we serve it at our special luncheon.
now no one likes you - what went wrong?
12-21-2011
As I said earlier, you will notice that the Book of Kings covers the kings from both the Northern and Southern kingdoms. Generally, the author writes of one king and then the other who would have been serving at approximately the same time. Here is a link to a chart that shows all of the kings and the prophets. I find it quite helpful to keep a copy of this in my bible as I am reading through these books.
Professor Oh has a few videos on her YouTube channel in which she explains the basics of Hangul pronunciation. These videos were really helpful whenever I forgot how to say a specific character or in establishing more clearly the difference between some others. She also has a couple worksheets for download.
Don’t let your spoken words run rampant either. Be conscious of what you say out loud. Your mind chatter will begin to reflect that, and you will not have to battle the mind chatter caused by speaking meaningless, gossipy, hurtful words.
Hope everyone’s well. I have been keeping up with blogs and such just not updating my own as I’ve reached a bit of a plateau in my running career right now. But I’m sticking with it and that’s what counts, right?
"I firmly believe we can meet that goal," Kass told me during an interview. "We're seeing amazing energy around the issue and communities really starting to begin to tackle this in ways that make sense to them."
So we ordered our tickets — because, well, that’s how it works here in Korea — and we were set to go. The tickets cost 8,000 won, so that’s less than eight dollars, and in the theater, there’s assigned seating — no waiting in horrendously long lines on opening day! There was also a bunch of food vendors right outside the theater selling some awesome squid and other various stuff, and the security seemed really lax about people bringing food in.
8. Line a baking tray with aluminium foil. If using a banana leaf, place it on the lined tray and lightly grease with oil (if not, grease the foil). Scrape the meat paste onto the banana leaf (or foil). With lightly greased hands, firmly pat meat paste into a square that’s about 3 cm thick, smoothing the top and sides. Use a toothpick or bamboo skewer to dock the paste at regular 3 cm intervals (this prevents it from puffing excessively).
“If you become a catamaran and sail away from me,” said his mother,
Now that's up to them, but why imply that two are available? I dislike this misleading way of doing things. It is presumably to ensure that the "look" of the bar is maintained. Better though to take the clip off when the beer isn't available, or better still to buy another extraction spear. They are cheap as chips and this place, believe me cost millions.
The Groom leads the way.
The agenda of the call organizers was clear. Two speakers, one of whom was a (non-Jewish) Democratic senator, spoke of our country’s need for “raising revenue,” the new code phrase for tax increases. When I suggested that we separate politics from spirituality, a third participant pushed back, saying “the Torah is a political document.” A curious assertion in a crowd that would quickly denounce any invocation of the Bible in political discussions.
Often there is a saxophonist standing outside the station playing for contributions. He is a talented musician. He plays very difficult scales and very complicated jazz runs.
Our 1959 building is well taken care of, well loved, and previously served our community needs. However, it is also overcrowded and needs more space for library programs, books, computers and volunteers. Electrical, plumbing, lighting, ventilation, and access for the disabled require upgrades. Since 2006, community focus groups and the Library Board have researched ways to expand or relocate our seriously overcrowded library.
Responding to the overwhelming demand from readers on the libraries loaning The Hunger Games books, Paper Plus is discounting these books by 30% over the next seven days, to all those who show their public library card at the counter.
Try to imagine using every day items to display collectables or special merchandise. The sky is the limit as to what you can use. It's easy to find discarded suitcases, cribs, ladders, wine racks, hanging baskets, drawers and other great upcycle-able items at swap shops, recycle centers, even your own home. Add a little imagination and you can have a display that will add charm and dazzle.
Call it what you will; a backlash against celebrity, a craving for humbler icons and a more back to basics approach, or simply the power of the internet turning the attention onto the everyday woman. The point is, this year was for me less about aspiring to look like an Olsen and more about wanting a simpler and more rewarding lifestyle. The rise of photo blogs has had us interested in interiors; organic portraits of the way people really live trumping over-styled editorials.
Attitude and Work-ethic beget what you deserve.
Ray Davies & The Kinks
Time to Come (1992)
- Scientists say that people growing marijuana indoors use 1 percent of the U.S. electricity supply, adding to global warming. McBrooklyn
Ignorance they say is bliss, so with the Wine exam looming I achieved a state of total zen like tranquility. Not so some of my housemates who had broken nights and possibly for one a sleepless night. I slept like a baby till 6:10 and decided that the extra 20 minutes until the alarm were not worth it so into the shower. This had an unfortunate knock on effect. Little did I realise that the person in the next room had forgotten their watch after a weekend at home and was relying on my getting up and moving around to wake them. Hence, whilst I was still luxuriating in the steamy confines of the bathroom I heard them leave their room and head downstairs. Joining them just after 6:30 I heard about the movements of the previous night and the innumerable cups of coffee and tea that had been drunk in the quest for Wine knowledge.
What do you believe about God?
Copics -
Anything he wanted passed could have been passed and much of it wasn't because Democrats crossed the aisle and joined with Republicans to stop some of Obama's most egregious political proposals.
Since then he has been performing all over the nation and even performed few weeks ago in US..
So waking up to the reality of a piano bar-less pop culture, Joe and I have done a fun thing. We’ve created one at home. In recent years I’ve focused on learning some favorite classics (easier versions of Mozart, Beethoven, Schubert, etc.). I am working George Winston’s arrangement of Pachebel’s Canon up to tempo (how I love that piece of work!), and homing in big time on Scott Joplin’s rags.
While on the road I was able to visit family and spend a day in Portland enjoying art and some slow-paced browsing. If you are in that neck of the woods definitely check out the biennial show at the Portland Museum of Art. I thought it was one of the best that I had seen.
10. Mr. Jaws - Dickie Goodman
And, of course, here's the fabulous theme music from his show - Supernature by French electro-disco pioneer Cerrone (with lyrics added by none other than Lene Lovich, and gyrations and hip-thrusting courtesy of the salacious Hot Gossip):
He should be in the Celebrity Big Brother house. He can cook, he can hit annoying twats with his plank of wood and he could nurture ducks in the jacuzzi.
I'm looking forward to reading about what everyone did with this recipe. Some things I'd like to try next time: with cooked rice and mix it all together like a risotto, making it in little baby pumpkins for individual servings and maybe a sweet version - like a rice pudding with pumpkin pie spices and pecans??? Oh, the possibilities!
I've danced with people that have interviewing skills that would make Barbara Walters look like a rookie.
Again, consider Bangladesh, where the problem is particularly acute because we have systematically destroyed various avenues through which grass root politicians can arise. There is no student politics, or labour movement, or environmental or community movement. Local government mayors and chairmans have no authority. This seems to be a far bigger problem than worrying about the dynasties as such.
Total points: 28
Oh boy, was it Savannah who got the mosquito bites? Poor her!!
Not a minute too soon, the Department of Homeland Security has announced that it is creating “environmental justice” units that will be empowered to oversee regulations in conjunction with local governments throughout the country. The framework for the Environmental Justice Working Group includes eleven federal government agencies, including the TSA, the Secret Service and FEMA. Go big or go home, right?
The chef says it will take more time than either of the other 2 exam dishes so we need to really get cracking with our time management.
Brian Aherne The Great Garrick
- Sentiment is Crafty Sprouts Have A Cool Yule
The first thing you must realize when making bagels is: do not use the entire yeast packet. Bruce Ezzell’s bagels called for 3 g of yeast to his 1.9:1 flour:water ratio (or 2.25:1 sponge:flour ratio if you prefer), and for some reason I was surprised how yeasty and “spongey” the dough was when I put seven times the amount of yeast in it. It tasted sour and I had to add over 100 g of additional flour to compensate.
I think fall was one of my Mother's favorite times; maybe being born in September had a little to do with it. My mother would just come to life when the apple farms and cider mills went into full swing. Her great love for pork didn't hurt either, she always said that apples and pork were a match made in heaven and I would have to agree.
something called the refugee mentality. They expect things to be done for them,
Speaking of baller, I finally got my Christmas tree put up. And it wasn't anywhere near as tragic as last year's Christmas tree dramz.
make sure you always put yourself first..
Preheat the oven to 215˚C/425˚F. Grease a skillet, if you have one, or a round cake tin if not, with ⅔ of the butter, then sprinkle over ⅔ of the sugar. Core and peel the apples, then cut in two. Set the halves upright, tightly-packed in the pan. Sprinkle with the remaining sugar and butter (cut into small pieces). Place the pan over medium heat and cook for 20 minutes or so, or until a light caramel forms on the bottom.
When it comes to formatting, you do not need a title page for the synopsis, your contact details go in the covering letter, and the novel’s details go on the same page as the synopsis. Start by putting the following information in the top left-hand corner of the page.
Wednesday I had my second round of oral surgery. A good friend is about 6 months or so ahead of me in the process, and she's waiting for the crown work to be completed. Takes a long time, especially when there are extractions with bone grafting before the implant process can begin. I believe we both had multiple sides. The docs won't work on the left side until the right side is healed completely. The left side had the first surgery in November, now the right. It's giving me fits.
Yet another group that has survived replacing two of its members, and are dare I say stronger as a result? I had never really been a U-KISS fan, but Soohyun’s voice in their Japanese single Tick Tack got my attention. Add Neverland to that and I’m really becoming much more of a fan of theirs. I will continue to youtube stalk them…
comprehensible even to strangers, the tourist
All he’d want you to do
I didn’t know it until I happened onto Lenore’s blog, but I’ve been a Free Range Parent for my kids’ entire lives. And I was raised by a Free Range single mom. I was a Free Range Kid!
Note - Use one colour at a time on any image.
that you are one of a kind
And there. And there. And there.
There was an ASG (American Sewing Guild) event on Saturday from 9-3 (or so). I wasn't sure if I'd be able to make it, what with everything going on. But there was a designer coming for the presentation and I really didn't want to miss it. With the wedding dress done and the bridesmaids dresses pretty much done, I decided that I needed some time for me. So I went! I hadn't pre-registered, but they let me in anyway.
Some reference books, my daily file box (in pink) and the file box with my Grandma's writing in it . the tape dispenser (that I moved up out of the reach of Liam) and my extra markers and storage box for the camera and it's cords and charger.
Cheshire
Let me tell you know, once that stuff has dried onto your car it is STICKY! Presoaking is required.
A Mr. Dodson was armed with a nine shot .22 caliber revolver, black and silver and Mr. Selsor was armed with a .22 automatic Lugger Blackhawk.
Ten CDs By The Fall You Should “Visit” Before You Die: A Luggage Seller’s Guide
Thriller - exciting
3. Abolishes the IRS. Employees of the IRS will be transferred into the US Treasury national sales tax area.
I do subscribe to some other relationship sites on my Google Reader. However my Google Reader is so full of unread blog posts that I often just tune off altogether. So the best way is still to subscribe to a newsletter.
Overall, on first impressions, Austin & MacAuley hit the early marks with strong cover artwork, a slick website and some marketable titles out of the 100+ listed books over the past four years, but scratch much below the surface, and it becomes a struggle to join the dots up here. Their website has a number of grammatical errors and lacks real detail and substance regarding the kind of publishing they offer and their ability to distribute books to the trade.
The Organized Classroom Blog recently wrote a great article about hosting a winter/Christmas classroom party. For tips, ideas and games, you must head over to her blog! Here are a few highlights...
Spring has almost arrived here in California and this season it means pretty prints and pastels. I was so excited to see mint green, light pink and yellows all over the March & April issues of Vogue. Mrs. FFF has been seriously watching her pennies lately, so I had the perfect opportunity to splurge a couple of weeks ago at the Goodwill Industries 50% off clothes and shoes Presidents Day sale!
till I have written it to you.
They were using this question as a trap, in order to have a basis for accusing him. But Jesus bent down and started to write on the ground with his finger. When they kept on questioning him, he straightened up and said to them, “Let any one of you who is without sin be the first to throw a stone at her.” Again he stooped down and wrote on the ground.
I did get my one clumsy move for 2010 out of the way today. Last year, my groove involved missing a step going downstairs at my house and doing a face plant at the bottom of the stairs, a week after getting my cast off my arm. At least I didn't have an audience for that performance (outside of the furry four-footed kind). This year, I waited until I arrived here in California and made my move in front of Bubba Gumps. Evidently I am not even coordinated enough to walk down the sidewalk without falling down. In the rain. Hard. Busted. Embarrassed. Sigh.
He told me a story of one of his trips up to Belfast. He spoke of driving the Causeway Coastal Route from Belfast up to Bushmills and then to the causeway. He told me of driving along this scenic road with views of the water on one side and inlets, lakes and islands on the other when he ran across a wall that had painted upon it, “No Popery Here” or something along those lines and Union Jacks and the Ulster banner, which until 1973 was the flag of the Northern Ireland government, flying all around. Peter mentioned how the gorgeous view was marred with this display and to what end? Mary also shared with me that I would find the roads a little more drivable up there, she found them wider and found them better maintained. So with all that in mind, we awoke very early and started our adventure to the Giant’s Causeway.
Sleeper Agent – Proper Taste (Mom + Pop)
It's about this time each year that I begin to appreciate just how ridiculously optimistic the gift-knitting plans I made early in the year truly are (seriously, I must have been smoking something particularly strong this summer...a couple of days ago I came across a handwritten -- well, scrawled, anyway -- list that suggests I was planning to knit no less than five cowls, four scarves, three lace shawlettes (LACE? WTF, Piggy?), two children's cardigans and a pair of socks...I'm astonished eight maids-a-milking or 11 pipers piping didn't make the list, frankly), and I start to scale down. Waaaaaaay down.
AYR reports that, contrary to previous statements, Bruce Ratner told shareholders in June that the arena would open in mid-2011, at the earliest. FCR's Bruce Bender, trying to spin, suggests groundbreaking would occur in the fall. It doesn't.
And so I take what's given to me and I sit back.
My manager buddy – we’ll call him Mike – was sitting at a table with me, smiling as always, and replied “Yeah, I think I’ve heard of that. It’s uh…what is it again?”
Please forgive any missspellings. My phone does not let me spell check.
Slipping through my fingers all the time
Here's a recipe for cultural enlightenment: Take a cross-section of your life, add one part war complete with flying bombs, destroy part of your town, go without food for four days, alot yourself a few cups of water per day and then imagine accomplishing the things you're expected to do on a daily basis. Can you do it?
It was then I’d woke up in the middle of the night, leaving a dream that made my brain buzz. I tried to shake it off, leave it where I found it. In my dreams. But it wanted to be let out. So I sat down in secret and started writing.
Please join us each week for our Anything Goes linky.
“I spend my days off the way I want to spend them,” he told reporters. “My off-day is my off-day.”
None of this film has a basis in reality, not even emotional reality. Sure, I get the double-date conundrum, but the resolution to this problem is so horribly patronising to all involved that the characters begin to fall to pieces well before the credits start rolling. It defies logic how someone as smart as Lauren does not realise there are two reconnaissance men literally running around her apartment while she’s dancing in her underwear and eating popcorn. And to be so ill-advised by her trash-talking friend, Trish, throughout the entirety of this double-dating debacle? The director and scriptwriter seemed to think that in order to make a woman sound empowered, she had to act like a male character out of a Farrelly brothers movie (think ‘Woogie’ from There’s Something About Mary). Trish is brash and crass and all-round awful; she has sex with her husband at the same time every week while eating some kind of Cheeto-type junk food, and her punchlines are so soul-crushing that they actually made me want to throw things at her, just to stop her giving all token comedic female characters a bad name. (Although if anyone could name me one good comedic female sidekick, I’ll watch the movie they’re in.)
I’ve written most of my life, I read every genre out there including science fiction and even romance. (Although I am not a fan of contemporary fiction or chicklit)
Level 15: Mastery: +63%, Weapon ATT: +15, Minimum Critical Damage: +8%.
All that being re-capped, I’ve come up with a new way of dealing with this… and when I say ‘new way’ I mean it’s ‘new’ for me and my current struggles.
So Peter, thank you for sharing such a special gift - a great start to what feels like will be a wonderful year.
Listing our fortunes can help us heal faster, I think.
Anyhow, I wont keep rambling on... I will endeavour to get those pics up of the kids over the Easter break and also hopefully tell you some good news regards the job interview.
There's other things I've done in a jam when I don't know where to go with my WIPS: brainstorm with someone, character studies, and something that works extremely well for me- cleaning or doing some other mindless task that let's my mind float free and come up with different ideas.
Useless eaters. All they do is they destroy the environment, and they don’t produce anything. They just sit around and watch TV.
“Let it Rise”, written by Holland Davis, will be featured as the “Song of the Week” on www.MyrrhWorship.com for the week of March 5th! Myrrh Worship is so excited to be able to feature this remarkable song on the site and is very encouraged by the response this song has had on reaching so many congregations across the country every week. “Let it Rise” was also recorded by Fervent Records recording artists, Big Daddy Weave, so be sure to visit Myrrh Worship March 5-11 to check out their version of the song AND to receive a FREE Lead Sheet Download of Holland’s incredible song!
hrum yuwaziya
I also take a photo and print it on paper using tracing paper sketch the photo scan it into photoshop elements and blow the print up to the size I wish using an inexpensive program called “Big Picture”. It is one of the best investment I have made as far as usable software. I can decide on the size and it prints out the picture on computer paper that is number with the row and column.
Yoochun move slowly at first but when he heard his wife moan in pleasure he fasten his pace. Junsu’s body bounce front and back on the bed as Yoochun trust into his hard and fast.
Nicholas Fox of Beresford & Co. says: “A lot of people think there is no problem here because disks and downloads are protected by copyright. However, that is just not true. Copyright protection only protects code against copying. In contrast, patent protection enables a company to monopolise an invention even if competitors independently come up with the same idea. In order to protect their commercial interests companies need patent claims directed towards the products and processes that are sold in the market place. In the case of computer based inventions this means that claims to disks and downloads embodying an invention are required.”
-Brock is beating the shit out of Cena!
I was sitting out on the sand in my trunks after angrily refusing to swim during the mandatory practice swim. I had heard an announcement. There was going to be a talent show. One time I tried to participate in a talent show. I had written a song I was going to sing and I began to sing it when stage fright got the best of me. Everyone thought I was cute, but I felt horrible. I could only run off the stage in tears as the next act showed me up.
I will be emailing you individually to let you know which Brainbench certifications you still need to earn (passing score is a 2.75) before the end of the semester. Please take the exams as soon as possible and retake them as needed throughout the semester. Remember you can use the internet and textbooks while taking the exams, just not someone else! The highest score you earn, passing or not, will be recorded as a grade this semester. If you have questions about this, please ask me.
“Ah, Mrs. Archer?”
Friday evening I was driving home from visiting Dad in the hospital when I got a text from Great Dancing Argentinian, whom I wrote about a couple of weeks ago in Making the First Move. We had had a really great first date and then kind of stalled out, as sometimes happens. How are you Jen? Did you know there is a social in Kissimmee tonight?
We are accidents of chance
You know what else was in there? A Check. For $500. From our old apartment complex that I was TOTALLY not expecting for 2 reasons. 1. We already got a check from them a couple weeks ago for some smaller amount, which I thought was our security deposit refund - and I was bummed when I thought we didn't get it all back! 2. I didn't realize we were going to get our security AND pet deposit back!!! I thought the pet deposit was non-refundable! Hm, who knew? Not really sure what the first one was for (maybe since we left early, they gave us back some of our rent? Dunno. Guess I should have paid more attention to what the other part attached to it said!) Even though we were getting back what was already our money - I WAS PUMPED! So with that lovely $500 we are now at $3,128 for our updated home study/dossier goal!!! Only $672 more to go! WOW!
Knight also released her women's collection in 2007 and when Preston passed away a couple of years ago she took over the business. Knight's designs take inspiration from 18th century old French Priest Coats, Edwardian frock coats and military jackets or antique silk and lace jackets, blouses and skirts. Now that is my kind of designer!
Lamport, Draughton, Loddington or Faxton!
Short post. Tonight I made my first ever 10 gallon all grain. It was a simple saison recipe that I scaled up from a 5 gallon recipe that I did a month ago. The first batch of saison that I made on July 28 was kegged up two weeks ago and served at a party at our house. With 50 guests, several of them beer lovers and homebrewers, it took all of 3 hours to kill 5 gallons.
Miranda & Charlie
nobody would run away from home to go do drugs.
If you’re looking for a similar regular volunteer opportunity, Kacie recommends checking out the Hands On Nashville website and seeing which opportunities look intriguing. “There are a lot of projects that do not require a specific skill set, which makes it very easy to find a project match!”
It's fashion week in Milan.
My team and headquarters were shocked and confused, it was a perfect time to begin the operation, but I told them that I would explain it later; and I had to yell to get them to follow my orders, but they did.
Artwork of the CDr is included, also a scan of the original "Anaconda" tape- cover, and some pics of the gig, shot by me with my little pocket- cam. SHARE & ENJOY
Today we are excited to be part of a Weather Blog Hop! Please link up your own weather-related posts and be sure to visit other posts and other bloggers who are hosting this Blog Hop!
You make me feel like i'm the most beautiful girl in the world
Officially, I am okay with these sweet pictures "catching me up" so that I can get back to all of the current goings on in our home and life! And if by some chance our children actually have a hard copy of this in their hands (because Mommy really followed through and printed this thing off), please know that each and every special day and event are etched in my mind even if this blog doesn't have a photo and story to document it! I love each of you so incredibly much!
It puts things in perspective.
It didn’t take long to learn about our (Acer palmatum dissectum ‘Crimson Queen’). This elegant specimen tree, with fits finely cut leaves and weeping habit, can can be grown just about anywhere in zones 5-8, reaching a height of 8′ to 10′ and a spread of 10′ to 12′. After it leafs out in spring I get underneath it and carefully prune to reveal the shapely trunk. And it gets an occasional spray of deer repellent to keep nibbling to a minimum.
Old recipes oftentimes do not give a specific oven temperature. That's because they were originally developed back when people cooked on woodstoves and there wasn't any really accurate way to know the temperature. Our OLD pie recipe says to bake in Slow Oven. A Slow Oven is normally considered to be 300°F. I made note of that in the recipe.
Place them on the prepared baking sheets about 2 inches apart and cover with a towel.
In addition to the foregoing General Objections, Plaintiff objects to Interrogatory No. 1 on the grounds that it grossly mischaracterizes the May 30, 2005 article that is the subject of this lawsuit (the "Article"). As is plain from the face of the Article, the Article was neither "satirical" nor a "parody." Nor was access to the Article limited only to subscribers of www.almartinraw.com. Subject to the foregoing General and Specific Objections, Plaintiff responds that the Article and/or the content of the Article was republished by dozens of websites immediately following the publication of the Article by Defendants on www.almartinraw.com and www.conspiracyplanet.com. The content of the Article and the Article itself was rapidly and widely disseminated through the New York financial community via electronic and verbal communications. The Article was brought to the attention of Plaintiff and/or his representatives by multiple sources in the New York financial services community shortly after the initial publication of the Article by defendants.
Glue this page inside the card on the right hand side.
Recently, my husband, the Amazing Bob, and I went to London. From Geneva, it’s an hour-long flight, followed by an eternity stuck in rush-hour traffic. Yet as our voluptuous British taxi jerked and crawled through the streets, we were dazzled. Before us stood Buckingham Palace.
The stuff about the yeast press and duty free beer is an interesting point. When duty was charged on the gravity of wort before fermentation, brewers were allowed 6% wastage during production. That is, they only paid duty of 94% of the wort that went into the fermenters. If you could manage to waste just 4%, then you weren't paying tax on 2% of a batch. Brewers became obsessed with clawing back any wort they could. That's also why re-using ullage was so popular. That was also effectively tax-free beer.
The boys had one particular little mate that lived in the server room and, despite orders to the contrary, they kept their mousey fat on biscuit crumbs and boiled eggs.
* Super Natural Every Day - by Heidi Swanson. This book is full of good for the body go-to recipes that I keep on going back to over and over again.
I’ve been working with LOD today, mostly. LOD is what you see in the distance. Like distant trees, rocks, mountains, buildings. Those sorts of things.
“It’s not a good idea to put on a ‘Women and Investing’ seminar,” said Don Grant, senior investment management specialist for Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC, during an InvestmentNews webcast Tuesday on attracting female clients.
His middle name is ‘Ray’.
Angie had a bad asthma attack this weekend…finally went to the doctor’s on Monday after too many treatments at home. She took a treatment in the doctor’s office that did not good; he sent her to Infusion for the same kind of treatment she gets at the emergency room along with some oxygen. The doctor told her if that treatment didn’t help, he was going to admit her to the hospital. The treatment helped – not 100%, but she was breathing better. She has been home since then…I think she’ll stay home today. Now she’s coughing!
I think that I shall never see
Genre: Thriller, Suspense, Post Apocalyptic
However I’ve thought of all the reasons I’ve given up in the past: it was too hard, I didn’t see results fast enough, I thought I wasn’t worthy of the end goal, I doubted myself too much, I let someone talk me out of what I wanted….
Since I am preparing for a vending in central NY the weekend of June 9 (huh? what? more later) AND leaving for CA on June 8 for my granddaughter's HS graduation I figured I'd better get these submissions done sooner rather than later.
76. Thought about running away? - Not really. I usually want to run off, though - a totally different feeling. Like running off with my honey for a weekend together. We've never really been able to do that. I'm looking forward to it someday.
Like in many Western remakes of Japanese horror films, there is also an effort to destroy the threatening Other. In the Grudge Buffy valiantly tries to burn the house down, and in the Ring the frightened mother tries to appease Samara’s angry spirit. These solutions are part of a Western tradition of exorcising the evil and re-establishing the status quo. Pulse follows suit and Mattie with the help of a grease monkey who bought Josh’s computer, uses a virus Josh created to shut down the system, thereby destroying the ghosts. In contrast, Kairo ends quite bleakly with little hope of a resolution. The film’s female protagonist is adrift on a boat with other survivors, but there is little sense of connection between them as the film closes on the indefinite search for more people.
Finally, Cheef Clothing, the maker of my favorite sweatshirt (It says "I was here first"): The website is down, but hopefully will be back up soon!
I have always loved camping. Camping in a tent, camping in a trailer, in the forest or the desert - for a party or as a quiet chance to reconnect with nature. Hell, I’ve even been a summer camp counselor, taking children into the forest for money. I freaking love camping.
I love Baroque music. I also love cowboy music, both old and new.
Crack the eggs into the same skillet, and cook. (you an either cook them as a hard fried egg and then cut into pieces or scramble them and cook that way). Remove and set aside.
About the company: Pure Romance is one of the nation’s leading and fastest-growing woman-to-woman direct sellers of relationship and intimacy aids. Its premier line of products is marketed through a distinctive network of in-home parties organized by more than 75,000 specially trained or certified independent sales Consultants throughout the United States, Australia, Canada, Puerto Rico, South Africa, and the U.S. Virgin Islands.
And the big, big wheels of thunder roll,
If you line up on the other side of my views generally, you may want to let this one go. I welcome all comments, of course, but can guarantee there is nothing anyone can say that will shift my views on this subject. At all.
Memory work: I started having my kids memorize verses when they were young. As the years have gone by, though, I've added other things to our memory work: facts from history and science, grammar rules, multiples in math, Latin roots, and anything else that is pertinent to what we're learning in school. I know many who attend Classical Conversations groups for this very purpose.
“All sections of the community, civic, legal, commercial, and agricultural, of town and country were present, and all places of business in town, including the banks, were closed during the funeral, and as a mark of respect and recognition of the deceased’s military service, Colonel P. Krog and Lieutenant JEFF. Becker were in uniform. The sympathy of the Girl Guides and Brownies was demonstrated to Miss Claudia van Zyl, a Guide, and little Miss Marie van Zyl, a Brownie, by the uniformed presence of their officers, Miss Tenant, Captain, Mrs. Snelling, second Captain, and Miss Saayman, acting Brown Owl.
The activity in Iran and the Iran-Iraq border were caused by pre-emptive Zionist attacks in the region, having nothing to do with the Plejarans and Andromeda Council.
If you are an artist in the Kingdom and would like to get your work profiled, Alicia welcomes you to contact her personally at: essentialfitra@yahoo.ca
2. I put TV/music on in the background. I do this because it prevents me from staring out the living room window and creating imaginary worlds in the lattice entrance I can see. The monitor the TV is on (or the music visualizer) acts as a buffer and I usually get distracted enough to turn back to the other screen and write.
To qualify for the kit, comments will be due by midnight EST, Sunday, March 25
Philemon had opened his heart and his home to the church. I should do likewise, opening myself and my home to others, offering Christian fellowship to refresh people’s hearts
Christmas is our family’s time to share fun, laughter and happiness.
So I urge you to leave room in your outline, brain, heart, or wherever, to allow for something unexpected to happen while you write. Just be open to the idea. Be open to the strange.
Stearyl Citrate – See Stearyl Alcohol.
Hallo!
I have repeatedly posted about this in the past. This is how the media gangs up against and vilifies white South Africans.
They were all so excited (and smiling) as they ran past us when the race began!!
But how do we respond to Jesus telling this leper to be quiet, and carry on his business as usual? This seems rather bizarre. Why would Jesus do something of this nature? Some speculate that the reason Jesus was so harsh with the leper in his rebuke was because Jesus knew in advance (foreknowledge) that he was going to disobey. This is certainly true, but there is more to this, and verse 45 reveals what is behind this strange request:
Cameron’s “common values” that he would like immigrant communities to commit to echoes Laura Bush at the time of the USA’s re-entry to UNESCO after years of absence, when she said that UNESCO “can now help to achieve peace by spreading the values that will defeat terror and lead to a better and safer world”. She, of course, was referring to the values and worldviews of “the other” who in her view, sowed terror, whereas for many in the global south, it is the values, worldviews and ideology of wealthy countries in the north and the manner in which these are expressed economically, politically and militarily, that are the chief source of terror in the world.
After making sure that Reese is still alive, Natalie and Paul leave to get help. In the car, Paul tells Natalie that he called paramedics to rescue Reese. Natalie then waxes philosophical, telling Paul that what happened will become an urban legend too, and will change as each new person tells the story. As Paul asks what the plot twist will be at the end of the urban legend, Brenda pops up in the back seat, holding onto her ax. Paul glimpses her in the rearview mirror, and the car swerves all over the slick road as they try to avoid Brenda's attacks.
Digital Camera, Netbook, Oscillococcinum, Vitamin C (30 1000mg tablets), Clorox Wipes, and lots of ziplock plastic bags.
Digital Spy - more than 8m
It's actually not blustery at all today!
‘Bounce Back’ is really just the better known term for resilience, a word we probably don’t talk or hear enough about. So when you think about your ‘bounce factor’ really you should be asking yourself ‘how resilient am I’?
What makes a green smoothie green? A leafy veggie – like kale or spinach. Having a green smoothie as a snack or start to your day means stepping off with a ton of natural sugar for energy (from fruit), vitamins and minerals your body needs (from fruits and veggies), a bunch of antioxidants (again from the F & V), and a good shot of fiber to keep you regular. If you opt to include a scoop of greek yogurt you’re also getting some active cultures, and that’s going to keep you on the regular as well.
EPISODE 164
Local MP Rushanara Ali said she would be raising the matter in Parliament tomorrow. She said it was ‘unprecedented’ for missiles to be placed on residential buildings, adding: ‘This is a heavily built-up area. There has been no consultation – people have been told that this is what is likely to happen and people are very worried.’
By the time these remnants of civilization end up on our shore, they are utterly changed from their former selves, studded with rocks, coated in seaweed, broken and battered.
Below you will find some common guidelines for publicity under the new reporting format. Publishers are encouraged to contact your Publisher Relations manager for review of specific promotional materials.
- Rosemary P.
I can say that I’m still here, we exist as nobodies in this life,
The flowers were placed in a pile of things I didn't know where to store.
How to Claim the 7 Charisms Contained Within You
"But..."
I can only watch from the outside-- because I do not know what it's like to be addicted to drugs (nor alcohol, which my son isn't). I don't know what withdrawals feel like, but I've had enough addicts tell me that its worse than I could ever imagine.
Cold, gray and occasionally raining, I’m fairly certain nobody is sad to see May arrive. Despite the dreariness, the beat goes on…
1536: Reach Tobu Nikko station, take a leisurely 1 hour stroll back to hotel
It's a fun read and you'll learn a lot!
Jesus is inviting me to cast from the other side of my boat in regard to…..
So....I thought I'd list a few links of some lovely blogs that offer free digital stamps. Here they are in no particular order:
We hope we have given you some inspiration to get you started, for more pictures pop across to the personal blogs
to put the enemy out with his vajra-shovel.
In the cabinet I stashed things like fruit snacks (the gummy kind), pretzel sticks, and the 100 calorie snack-packs.
with the interior design of his home we did already in Belgium,
Second frequently asked question:
“No you won’t,” Ariela was still as calm as if she was visiting with friends about the weather. “You may die trying, but you won’t kill me.”
Our government can’t afford this interventionist policy. Think of the toll this is having on our troops! It’s easy to support something in idea but when it comes to reality, it’s the cost that makes it impractical and unachievable.
Such communication is vital, and it is what we often neglect. Instead of putting our specific lives into black and white where we can see them and do something about them, we leave them vague, unspoken, and unwritten. “Something” is bothering us, but we don’t know what it is. We sweep our feelings under the carpet. We turn a deaf ear to our quiet desperation. We are not ready or willing to attend to ourselves, and our souls know this. They are alert to the fact that they are ignored and unhusbanded. Is it any wonder that they are depressed?
Don’t get me wrong. I’m as chatty as the next girl. But I have friends. And family. And I don’t see enough of THEM so I’m hardly going to spend my time chatting to strangers who either a) have too much spare time on their hands or b) are just looking for a pen pal.
I can't believe a whole week has flown by. We haven't had any earth shattering events, just a lot of stuff going on. Alyssa has a lot of school stuff going on and has had a lot of demands on her time. I am very proud to say that she has been handling them very well!
It smells like sweet caramel and I get desiccated coconut; vanilla; mashed bananas with a milkiness. In the glass it's a rich dark brown colour with reddy; golden flecks and a brown creamy head.
I only really realized recently (try saying 'really realized recently' ten times fast :-P) that I'm actually, along with being anarchist, anti-civilization. I've held those views for a while, but only recently realized that those views had a name! Now, when people hear 'anti-civilization' their first reaction is often horror. They seem to feel it's as good as saying 'anti-human', although nothing could be further from the truth.
I love the idea of Victorian time travel using mirrors, electromagnetism, and static electricity. The static, naturally, attracted The Daleks. There’s something wonderfully Lovecraftian about this, unconventional science drawing otherworldly creatures to the location of the experiments. I love the image, albeit in my mind, of Daleks bursting out of mirrors. The Daleks want Jamie. Maxtible theorizes that The Daleks are attempting to discover what it is about humans that enables them to continually defeat The Daleks. This idea will be revisited much later, and to much less effect, in 2007 in Daleks in Manhattan/Evolution of the Daleks. But one story at a time.
The Day Trip to End All Day trips
£ 20
For me, it lasted a good six months or so: I got a job and a new
I can't really pinpoint a time in my life where music stopped being so important to me. I definitely feel the loss of it in an intense way, yet any attempt to re-capture it ends up being fruitless. I constantly rail about the crap on the radio, yet make no real attempt to find less popular music I might like.
1 tsp. minced fresh ginger
You would call me a whore, b***h, liar and fat
think?
So I stood up and went out of the bedroom and just held her. She had stopped crying. I didn't sing, just rocked her gently now. And within 5 minutes, with not a peep, she was sound asleep. She slept for 1hr 40mins (40mins longer than usaul at that time), and woke with a beaming smile.
To make the cake, in a bowl, combine the 1 cup cocoa powder and the chocolate. Add the boiling water and whisk until the chocolate melts and the mixture is smooth and blended. Set aside.
"...I actually spent three hours once, sipping tea and reading magazines while waiting to meet HR at Conde Nast (a 'crisis' had developed, the sweet JUNIOR HR girl told me when we finally had our interview, because her boss couldn't get out of the meeting: two girls at Vogue had gotten into a cat fight and one was threatening to quit and HR had to intervene). All I wanted was a little freelance layout work, and I ended up doing my own layouts as an 'audition'...
Look Back in Love vs. Look Back in Anger
At very few were critics allowed to ask questions.
“Actually, I don’t have a sense of needing anything personally. I’ve learned by now to be quite content whatever my circumstances. I’m just as happy with little as with much, with much as with little. I’ve found the recipe for being happy whether full or hungry, hands full or hands empty. Whatever I have, wherever I am, I can make it through anything in the One who makes me who I am.”
The composite survey rose by one tenth of a point to 93.9, which left it just below the high point reached in last winter’s economic pick-up. The economic expectations index continued its recovery from last summer’s low point by five points, but the other measures that go into the headline index were mixed. Needless to say, tight credit conditions have been the biggest obstacle to small business growth.
Out here on the West Coast lumber practically grows on trees, there's so much of it. Yet, for some reason, the lumber yard still charges ungodly sums for it. So whenever something needs to be built, my instinct is to scrounge around to see what is already on the farm property, at our home in Vesuvius or is otherwise free somewhere near.
I’m certainly not trying to objectify humans here. But what I’m saying is this – too many people undersell themselves, because they are not aware of their value. And by ‘undersell’, I don’t just mean salary-wise. I’d much rather take a lower-paying job with an employer who values me (and genuinely cannot afford to pay more) and will be invested in me such that I continue to grow and contribute more effectively to them and to future employers; than a job with an employer who pays a competitive salary by market standards, but thinks that they own me because they are paying me a salary, doesn’t respect me, and doesn’t improve me in any way.
The temple had a series of stairs leading to the top as it was built on a small hill. It made it look like one of those hill top temples in South India. The day we went in, there was also a pooja going on for Puri Jagannath. The Jagannath statue was very big. Photography was not allowed inside and hence no pictures. The main deity is Lord Ganesha and this is one of the biggest I have seen. I can say it was almost as big as the Mukkurini Vinayaka in Madurai Meenakshi Amman Temple.
at the edge of night
To fully trust in Christ we must know that just as life is costly so, too, are our relationships. A relationship with Jesus Christ costs us submission. I know the word submission in today’s equal rights world is yet another negative term, but if we will understand it and accept submission for what it really is, a willful act (choice) of servile flattery (serving/acting out of love and respect) then we will experience the eternal joy that God intended us to have in our lives. We must choose to submit to Christ’s headship over us, serving Christ not because He is our conquering hero but because we love and respect Him for what He chose to do for us on the cross. When believers do this, they become a part of Christ’s body, known as the church (1 Corinthians 12:27; Ephesians 1:22, 5:29-30; Colossians 1:18, 2:10). Quickly, let’s take this concept of the church a little further.
"No, my tires were on each side of it."
Globalisation has increased the size of agglomerations in that firms and workers are attracted to places with lower production costs and larger local markets which reinforce regional imbalances. In my view it seems that the only way countries can compete in the global market place is to make certain locations more desirable so that efficient firms looking to lower costs of production will move into regions. The free market does not allow this solution, agglomerations left to grow to unsustainable levels will lead to negative externalities of pollution, congestion and other social ills (as in the case of London, see the article in Saturday’s Guardian).
This is such a nice piece. It seems to be well made. It is sophisticated but not so formal that I can’t wear it with casual clothing. I look forward to exploring other jewelry by Pugster.
I am going through some stuff right now.
I became cynical about this whole inexpensive tablet thing declaring that as an hoax.
Nicole had a male co-worker walk her out to the parking lot after work. There was a note on her car underneath the windshield wiper. "I had totally forgotten that he knew what kind of car I drove because we had talked about it online."
I couldn't see the look on my face, but even I was terrified by me. At one point, Andy and I were walking upstairs to get a shuttle and had to go through a one person door. A woman cut me off by throwing her stupid fugly ass in the doorway without saying excuse me or apologizing and I finally let out a "Seriously? SERIOUSLY?!" at her before launching into the most cuss-filled rant I think I've ever made.
I was constantly questioning myself, did I give up? What did I do wrong? When we got pregnant with our second we were a bit more realistic in that I was going to try to breast feed, but still purchased a back up just in case. I had my son at a different hospital, and I was ecstatic to find out this hospital had a lactation consultant. Well the day they visited my son and I, they were extremely busy. They came in while I was trying to feed. They asked if I had breast fed before and I just simply said I had tried for about three months with my daughter. At this point I still did not think there was anything "abnormal" about my breasts in regards to breast feeding so I didn't feel any reason to divulge any other details. The consultant basically took a look at my breasts and said something to the tune of I did not have good breast feeding breasts, but since i'd had some success previously she would come back and try to work with me. She then left because she was in a hurry to see others. I didn't have good breasts? What the heck does that mean? Any hope I had to feed my son went out the door with her. I tried about a week with her voice in the back of my head and then stopped. I felt as though failure should have been tattooed on my forehead.
There is no form of fortune-telling or divination that begins with the letter “Q.” Dear me! Whatever shall I do? Oh, I know! I will make one up. Wait for it. . .
If you have favorite dealers at Marburger, or you are a dealer at Marburger and would like to be featured here at Hill Country House, please leave me a comment and I will be happy to post about you!
Well maybe it's the time of year or maybe it's the time of man .... but I am feeling themey. Themes are like filaments along which worthwhile thoughts can form. Think about a candy floss machine (that's cotton candy to our American cousins): I know about the mechanics of making candy floss because my friend Edwin bought me a candy floss machine for my birthday a couple of years ago. You start with a bit of sugar in the centre of a centrifuge and as it spins sugary filaments form. These filaments then become the sweet superstructure of the finished delicacy. What I am trying to say is that themes can become the superstructure of finished thoughts - or, there again, perhaps I am just demonstrating that candy-floss thoughts can be made out of practically nothing.
WHAT???
How would you reply if I were to ask you, "What's the most beautiful thing?" Would it be a special someone's smile. A sunset or rainbow playing behind your favorite vista? The Mona Lisa or Starry Night? Beethoven's Ninth or Imagine? Shall I Compare Thee to a Summer's Day or Thirteen Ways of Looking at a Blackbird?
As I was sitting there, I saw a car turn off onto a parking lot across from me and park. It's lights went off, and I decided to give it about a minute or so and then go check it out.
Weeeellll.... the middle of the month approaches. I simply must change my direction, and I refuse to repeat the decor of last year (yes, YOU try explaining the logic of that to the man) so I am left in a panic. BUT, my lovely eight year old and four year old sons have come to my rescue. The other day, while perusing Pinterest to look at craft ideas, they pointed out that many of my images had a green and aqua thing going on. They both LOVE turquoise and aqua and they are sold. It has taken me a couple of days... but it's possible that we have it.
Today, as I conclude the aspect of how our words affects us, let’s look one more time at James Chapter 3. Read with me verses 10-12;
We have a big box thats full of scraps of paper, card, ribbon, wool, and anything else we think will make a good picture and she likes to create little master pieces from nothing but scraps and a glue stick.
13. Summer Mood - Skip Martin
While the experts on Sumerian civilization may not agree precisely in their interpretations, the consensus is that the above three signs mean “freedom from taxes.” There are two features to observe about these ideograms. First, the word “freedom” here puts in its earliest written appearance. Second, is the remarkable clarity used to depict “taxes.” These Sumerians expressed in a symbol the nature of governmental “take” better than we express the process in our modern languages. Note its barb or fishhook or harpoon characteristics, suggesting, so very clearly, that this instrument is one which can be thrust into, but hardly retrieved from whatever it penetrates. The nature of taxation thus revealed itself at the very dawn of history, and experience confirms this early disclosure: Taxes are easy to increase but almost impossible to decrease.
While any cracker would work for this, the sweet lemony flavor of the Meyer Lemon Cookie Thins with the tart cranberry and creamy brie are an amazingly wonderful combination. These cookie thins also come in a gingerbread flavor, which I'd like to try with the cranberries, too. Wonder if it would be as good? I'll have to find out!
May 25
Going on to equate the way we recognize images of sexy women and objects - well that ought to be a weakness of the definition. Instead it is swallowed whole and as far as I can see the only reason is that it agrees with a cultural meme - women being treated as objects. Circular argument rooted in a definition - you see them a lot in psychology.
I look at photos of myself from recent years and recognize that I'm still in the process of "becoming". 19th century novelist George Eliott said "It's never too late to be the person you were always meant to be" and I like that quote. Rather than life being one transition after another it seems to me that there are lots of them happening at the same time. Certainly, the concept of "transition" has a unique meaning for me and people who have walked a similar life path, but that's simply one of the more visible examples.
And wander around while singing this song
I will be honest, this program is one of the most complicated things I have built yet. In the beginning I was panicking because I didn't know if I have taken on more work than I was truly ready for. But at the same time, I knew that my team was counting on me for this. By the second week of the project I was already burying myself in articles, research papers, forums and my own little testing framework to make sure I get every little detail right for this thing. From how security will perform if someone were to try and hack it to the minor click of a button on a panel. I wanted to ensure that everything would be to the best of my minor ability. This is obviously a much bigger challenge when you are working along. But it's not like I had a choice in the matter.
I asked “why God” and He told me it’s like E’s yogurt …As a mummy when my son won’t eat his dinner I will bring out the killer weapon PUDDING (usually in the form of a yogurt.) I do this to show him what he could have if he first eats his dinner. He will plea with us to give him his pudding but like good parents we hold our ground (for his own good.) The pudding is not a taunt it is an encouragement to get him to eat what is nutritious for him first.
And if not, we’ve got a brewery tour scheduled on Sunday.
Through Saturday, June 12th, you can score a
When Marge comes, she really is very mean to Harry, and more than a bit sadistic about it, telling him off for not liking his tone when he tells her what she wants to hear a bit too transparently. But when she starts to talk about Harry’s parents dying in a car crash, and probably being drunk and so on, calling Harry a liar when he tries to correct her story, Harry finally flips out, casts a spell on Marge to ‘blow her up’ – not like an explosive, but like an inflated balloon. And he runs away from the Dursley’s, carrying Hedwig and his trunk.
My mom is doing very well. Thanks for all the prayers.
Put all the ingredients in a mixing bowl and slowly add water while stirring the mixture. Add more flour if necessary. Heat up oil for deep frying. Use a small ladle to scoop some of the batter and deep fry in the hot oil until golden brown. Serve while still hot! Best eaten with chilly sauce.
Whether steampunk or suspense, sultry or sweet, the 21012 Tucson Festival of Books loves a good romance. With more than 40 remance authors, there’s an offering for the romanticc in all of us. Here are a few more to whet your appetite:
Did you love
Despite my efforts to squeeze every bit of activity into every crevice of every minute of every day, I have to admit I do my best work when I mentally board a metaphorical plane speeding toward a single destination.
“I can’t,” Benny leaned over and said.
NOTE: layout for this page only with photo of an old building in Montreal by eleanor angeles
My mother used to hang laundry outdoors on a clothesline in our back yard. We lived on the Texas coastal plains, so we had coastal breezes every day in the summer. Sometimes a summer shower would come up, and we'd run outdoors to gather in the clothes before they got wet. Nothing smells fresher than sheets that have been dried outdoors.
SHE HAS NO CHARACTER.
You don’t have to be a Malory geek to enjoy The Life of Sir Aglovale de Galis.
Karen Knegten c/o R.S.V.P. Rental Services
a weird counterpoint to lipsmacks and squishy tongues,
The other reality check was leg on does not mean leg on.... leg off... leg on again. Keep your damn leg on and aid from that position - don't remove your leg to aid - it really irritates your horse!!
It’s a beautiful, bright day. But, in the basement, it’s gloomy. The tiny windows don’t let in much light. In some places, the walls are covered by faux wood paneling. But in most places, the chipped, grey, stone foundation is clearly visible. The air is musty and stale. No one comes down here much except to grab something from storage or to use the washer and dryer that are pushed against the far wall.
As you have seen in the info page I made above, you have probably noticed that it’s the same thing as GMS’s and, in fact, other MapleStories’ Malaysia.
One time he was gonna go hunting and going to his lease before sun-up to prepare for the day’s hunt. And he gets out on this lease, it’s an hour before sun-up, and he hears a hog howling as if it were in pain, as if it were being attacked. And he hears some muffled sounds, as if something were attacking. And so he had a big flashlight with him. Of course, this guy, he’s got a gun, he’s not afraid of anything.
Suggestions on a postcard welcome.
Once the dotted lines commonly known as "dancing ants" indicate that I have the building selected, I make the mask part of the curves adjustment layer active. Even though I made the selection on the background layer, I can use the selection on any layer as long as those ants are still dancing. Next, I simply use the paint bucket tool to dump black into the selection.
I am also obsessed with colored jeans like everyone else, and I am excited to be able to fit my butt in these F21, Mustardy yellow jeans...cuz I'm not sure I could zip them when I first got them on this trip to Savers here...
- "So Cute" patterned paper collection
Alright, the Louboutin is wrong, but the Versa-CHE is actually right, since it’s Italian. However, AA might’ve NOT project(ed) those words properly.
A couple of months ago, I had some pretty bad sores in an area that was... lets say... inconvenient for the application of bandages. But Doc had a solution. With the kids in bed, I lay down on the couch while he attempted a delicate superglue surgery.
High priests of wisdom, sweetness, might, and bliss,
This is what is happening here in South Africa. The ANC police are turning on the public. They are not fighting crime and criminals; they are assaulting and killing the public…innocent citizens...black and white. But in our case the shepherd is not only looking on, he is enticing the sheep dogs, spurring them on to assault and kill the sheep...and ask questions later.
First, phone ‘radios’ are already designed operating in the frequency region (AWS vs. UMTS &DCS). (below from http://www.phonescoop.com/articles/article.php?a=99&p=1493)
First, an excuse (of sorts): During a routine visit to a doctor yesterday, there was a minor incident. Despite it being somewhat embarrassing (I prefer to be seen as strong and healthy and capable), the good thing is that it led to the discovery of severe anemia. Well, not such a good thing, but it explained many things, including my serious, complete, and confounding exhaustion for the past six months. When your blood pressure is that low, apparently, they are surprised to see you even standing!
He was pretty excited about this *new* product and couldn't stop extolling the virtues of this wonderful new stuff. He claimed that it was shatter resistant and if Dad wanted to, he could just drop a cereal bowl on the ground to prove it. So Dad decided to. He took one of the white bowls with little brown flowers on them and let it fall to the cement floor.
So I don’t have to fish anymore, or keep paying for broken armor caused by high level enemies OHKO-ing me. Which brings me to my next rant about WoW.
- Viva Pinata (sooooo sweet… :)
... All you have to do is send us your document ... with the deadline and we will guarantee delivery of a perfectly written document to give you complete confidence when you submit your work. The fee is worked out on a flat rate (£7.99 per thousand words or 0.799 pence per word), so you know exactly how much the proofreading will cost in advance. ..."This service is provided by one of a large number of companies which vie with each other for the custom of authors. Sadly it is my impression that, even at the relatively modest sum which these companies charge, virtually no use is made of their services by anyone who submits material for publication in JIPLP. This is a pity, since poor-quality text distracts peer reviewers and incurs extra, quite unnecessary labour for the editing and production staff. Good-quality proof reading would benefit not merely those contributors who are not native English-speakers but those who are and who, because they have never learned the rules of their native language or have forgotten them, sometimes produce texts of woeful quality.
Christ has conquered! Glory fills you!
I think of Spring and how much I love the mixture of brights and pastels, happy and sunny days, sprouting greens and blooming flowers. The contrast of light and dark is almost blinding but the light always wins out. This is Spring and I adore it!
As designers and personalities, John and Raf are chalk and cheese. While John Galliano is a dramatic, historical dress-loving romantic and rough diamond geezer genius, Raf Simons is - according to those I've spoken to who have worked directly with him - a clinically organised, philosophically minded and deeply emotional man who relishes process and is in a thrall to form, contemporary art and modernity.
It is interesting that before this, we have a record of Job making offerings on behalf of his children – just in case they sinned. We are not told that Job ever made an offering for himself. Like Peter, he was self-assured. Like Peter, Satan asked to sift Job like wheat. It is just such situations that we pray against in our prayers. We acknowledge our weakness and ask for strengthening. We ask to receive our lessons according to the way of wisdom and instruction.
I also discovered this absolutely marvelous library on Santa Monica and 6th. It has a mind-blowing collection of books- there’s one on Bayes Theorem, one on relativity, a copy of Car Science by the hamster!
Back to the apron. I saw this and I couldn't believe that I didn't think of it myself!
I know Michael has expressed his own thoughts on who is behind this smear campaign, but I also have my own thoughts too, and I do not rule out the possibility that this could be a disgruntled ‘vanity publisher’, as Michael calls so many author solutions services, or someone operating on behalf of one of them. Yes, I’ve my own thoughts on which it might be. There also remains the possibility it is actually someone in Michael's own locale, which is even more disturbing.
Of course, of course
XXIII
6pm start – All Ages show
This was fun! The potential to blow up the microwave oven, along with the potential to get seriously burned or injured was right up our alley. We prefer not to get injured or burned, nor do we wish to burn down the house or destroy the microwave, but, if the experiment is potentially dangerous, we can enjoy it more. It's our moment of heart-racing, what's-gonna-happen?, will-Daddy-be-mad-when-he-gets-home?, sort of the thing. It gets the adrenaline pumping and our nerves all rattled and it's just plain fun!
Mommy cried when i dropped you off but
Tuitele had written a waiver letter to the NCAA requesting a late entry to the Warriors football team, but was denied due to his time alloted to play for a Division I school.
The only true way to enjoy the natural beauty of the Grand Canyon is to see it for yourself.
A businessman told City Press he had to pay money into the trust after Malema assisted him to obtain a Limpopo government tender. Property developer David Mabilu and building material supplier Steve Bosch have been identified as other benefactors of the trust.
Robert R. McCammon – The Miracle Mile
Pleased with all our efforts, she blesses us with long life, good health, wealth, success of our families, sons and grandsons, our chosen wishes, dharma, artha, kama and moksha.
“Fangs,” she whispered and her eyes widened. Her heart missed a beat and then slammed painfully against her ribs. “He had fangs. He was going to drink my blood.”
Stuckey, for years a resident of Staten Island, talks about his life growing up in Brooklyn’s Sunset Park:
Parts of the area are paved with granite, but there is also a lot of tarmac. The reason for this does seem to have been financial. However, I was surprised to hear that my least favourite aspect of this compromise design - the markings painted on the square - was a deliberate decision. Rather than the usual small corner marks to show pitch locations, the architects chose more obvious, colourful painted lines which were meant to evoke a barcode. The contractors had to be convinced that the lines were intentional, and I'm not surprised. It's not to my taste: rather than barcodes, they evoke a very ugly car park!
These tin foil paintings were fun. I wrapped and taped a piece of tin foil to the back of card stock sheets. I made sure the kids all had aprons for this project. We used bright colored acrylic paint and foam paint brushes.
I’m doing this because I feel I have to.
salt print, palladium toned, hand made paper
This anonymous Motel isn’t that anonymous anymore. That’s WLGS named it when we heard about this amazing yet tacky motel outside of Melbourne. I was heading down that way to visit a friend for the day. I had a look on Google to see if there’s anything abandoned that I could go out and take photos of whilst I’m over that way. This was one of the sites that we found.
“Um….no….do ya think riding the motorcycle is the problem?”
We will continue to monitor the development and decision of this application.
Currently promoting their debut U.S. release available April 24, The Wanted’s latest video in their “Wanted Wednesday” series features the band touring the States and Canada. In the midst of meet and greets, radio visits and performances they manage to bring their own flavor to covers of Goo Goo Dolls’ “Iris” and Starland Vocal Band’s 1976 hit “Afternoon Delight.”
(v) Allah’s name cannot be given to His creatures
"With its 8% alcohol, Meister Max is a beer for a new and daring men generation.
There’s a new day coming
from the water bowl which sits untouched outside
"True, it's not the Atlantic Yards we once envisioned," Kruger acknowledged, but said it had the desired components: arena, housing, commercial realization. "It takes blight and it eradicates it from an area that desperately needs it," he said, contradicting others' descriptions of Prospect Heights.
Of my numerous blushers, the Jill Stuart Mix Blush Compacts hold a very special place in my heart.. They’re girly, pretty, pigmented, and basically every blusher lover’s wet dream. I bought my very first one – 03 Coral Glow from Taiwan earlier this year, and got a CP for 01 Baby Blush shortly after that. I just had to fill up the gap in between.. lol..
Miss Traide volunteered for this, unlike the animals she had a choice.
In my opinion, (b) may be plausible but the idea that a Muslim life is worth more than the life of a non-Muslim is rather flimsy and uncomfortable. In any case, the situation in Darfur, by comparison, also involves Muslims and is arguable worse than the Gaza dilemma in terms of the extremity of conflict. Yet it plays second fiddle to our concern with the Palestinian conflict.
And my friend Maren (right) and my friend Luell (left). Aren't they cute, in their Whooville outfits :) We were all supposed to wear jammies, to be festive.
Barely having enough money to get through aa week, but smiling all the time at all the good things in life, your kids, your friends, nature or even sunny days.
One of the things that came to light in their suit against McDonalds is that by Russian consumer law, McDonalds can not legally call their milk-shakes, milk-shakes but instead milk-containing shakes, since they put large amounts of vegetable oil in the shake instead of milk fat.
I can write 1500 – 2000 words a day. It takes about four hours of writing. Another ½ hour of planning, and many hours of thinking. Before I did NaNoWriMo, I would usually turn my computer on and have a look at what I had written the previous day and spend most of my time fixing it and not moving forward. With NaNoWriMo I mostly ignored
Must have been the cats.
This one become another turncoat situation when she realised the community weren’t as happy about it as she was. Back in March 2011
This year we have had many tokens of its certainty. One might almost compose an almanac for the year 1865, and put down the name of some one of note at least to every month, and I should scarcely exaggerate if I said to every week, in the year. All ranks and classes have been made to feel the arrow of the insatiable archer. From royalty down to poverty the grave has been glutted with its prey.
I sent an email to several of my gay Taiwanese friends asking for their thoughts on this topic. None responded. I decided to ambush one of them (who regularly dates foreign men) while out for drinks at Taipei's Red Square this past weekend, a well-known gay bar neighborhood, similar to Soi 4 in Bangkok, but prettier.
So yeah. Welcome to 2010!
Distinct technological objects will become as quaint as steam locomotives.
I dedicate this poem to Nick van Lieshout,
The big day came and as the justice of the peace was performing the wedding, Summer noticed all the people she knew sitting on the groom’s side on the church. She became bewildered and the ceremony was over before she came back to herself. “Travis, I don’t know what you’ve been drinking, but your kiss taste like the bottom of my outhouse. How do you know Bradley and Geraldine Hayes?” Summer asked him the moment their wedding kiss was over. “Oh, Geraldine is my momma’s sister.” Travis said with a smile. “Is there a problem?” Summer collapsed. Travis caught her and carried her out of the church, as the people thought it was a romantic gesture. They applauded Travis’ chivalry.
I'm loving the Bailey Button Triplet ones this year!
So onward with our Spring Theme. Do you recognize the cartridge I used? Nursery Tails. Just a reminder to take a second look at those cartridges. I did add a little inking around the scalloped border but other than that I didn't change a thing.
Down in Texas the post season has just started. We saw the Humble Kingwood boys dominate The Woodlands at the district level and the El Paso Eastwood girls team win a 5th consecutive district title. Region 1 should be loaded with some great races. The top individual boy and girl (Craig Lutz and Rachel Johnson) in Texas will both run Saturday at Mae Simmons Park in Lubbock. It is very possible that we will see the same school, Southlake Carroll, win both the boys and girls titles. Look for the SLC boys to be challenged by Marcus and Amarillo Tascosa, and the SLC girls to be challenged by Coppell and EP Eastwood. The 4a races should be a great time for El Paso with Isaac Spencer (EP Austin) and Joel Flores (El Paso Jefferson) contending for the individual title with Chuy Alegria of Ft. Worth Boswell. El Paso Jefferson will be a strong favorite for the team title.
balanced momentarily on the Atlantic horizon, a great orange balloon on the slate blue-grey of the ocean. A slight breeze rustled the hardy grass on the dunes, producing a whispering silver sound. The whispering was just part of a greater stillness, as were the continuous rising and falling hiss of the gentle waves on the beach, the shrill cry of a seagull, and the barking of a dog somewhere in the distance. It was growing a little cooler, that in itself a relief after the hot summer day. He watched the sun sinking below the sea, bleeding orange and yellow into the sky, etching a ruddy path from its going across the sea. He felt very peaceful.
A hell deep inside,
with Nate this morning
2.Boil kashmiri chilli for 5 minute and grind well to make a paste.
Quite popular with the locals and their assorted kueh mueh are not too sweet with no artificial colorings.
Definitely our ice bucket, it’s a great price point for a weekend get away hostess gift. I am also loving our super notepad because let’s face it, who doesn’t need a fabulous notepad!
This 1940s Vogue jacket pattern has been wanting to be made for some time, but I've never found the right fabric. I don't think this red & black wool is perfect but it will give the jacket a bit of a 'Pendleton' look which I'm quite keen on.
I am in deep need everyday in all sorts of ways. What if I could not go to God with all of those needs, including any struggle against sin, or failure? Because that is not spiritual, but soulish. That may be good Platonism, but it is not (good) Christianity. The Spirit will help us to pray according to God’s will. And will give us the heart and mind to do so. But we come to God in all our weaknesses, just as we are. We talk to our Father about our struggles and griefs, fears and concerns. All a part of our soul (= life), and all which indeed matter to God.
Orlande de Lassus Missa secundi toni (K, S, A)
I need some colour in my life.
Duration: 26.05. - 09/07/2011
This is the most expensive out of the throw pillows I picked for this room, but still not astronomical! $13 is a very fair price for this sort of thing, the total to buy an insert an this would still be under $20 a pillow which is average to less than the going rate on them. The color and pattern on this just added a little oomph to the room that I really liked and the faux silk adds a little more shine which I am a fan of. Overall a good buy I think!!
► I saved all my planters from last year to reuse. I know this sounds like a "duh" moment but generally, I've thrown them out. I'm not talking about the heavy duty, expensive ones but the cheap, white plastic hangers. Last year I decided to save them because as I was thinking about it, I realized how much cheaper it would be to just purchase some seeds or small plants and sow them directly into the planters. I also wish I had kept the little 4-pack boxes that you get when you purchase vegetables or flowers because I could really use those right about now.
Stay tuned for delicious Thai recipes in 45-70 days! " )
That hasn’t stopped a growing number of American distillers from developing brand identities and marketing plans based on that rattiest of American spirits. Yes, I know. Such distillers may hope to tap into American ideals of freedom and liberty (moonshine is, if nothing else, rebellion in a jar). Some evoke regional pride, others the history of a particular time or place, or a sort of pre-Prohibition Nirvana when the smoke from still fires wafted over countless thousands of American homesteads. I admit, these are appealing images.
Prohibition on Multiple Sales of Rifles Reporting Requirement. Preventing the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives from requiring licensed firearms dealers in four border States to report information on the sale of multiple rifles or shotguns to the same person would hamper efforts to address the problem of illegal gun trafficking along the Southwest Border and in Mexico.This reporting requirement is of dubious legality and even more dubious utility in stopping firearms trafficking to the narco-terrorists in Mexico. That the Obama Administration would single it out for special mention speaks to their true intentions regarding firearms.
where his paternal grandparents had settled after arriving from Sicily through Ellis Island in 1906, Tony La Russa spent 32 years at the helm of the Chicago White Sox, Oakland Athletics, and St. Louis Cardinals, winning six league championships and three World Series titles. A staunch advocate for animal rescue, he and his family founded ARF (Animal Rescue Foundation) in 1991, which aids abandoned
Betty Friedan started the women’s liberation movement with her book, ‘The Feminine Mystique,” arguing that it is wrong to treat half the population as less competent than the other half, even under the guise of “caring.” As in, “I care so much, I’m not letting you live a full life.” Moreover, it was driving at least some of the housewives crazy with boredom!
People if you are not sure your partner likes you enough without the use of others as a tool to test their desire of you, or if you feel the only way you can keep your partner around is by doing stupid shit like flirting with other people in front of them constantly, then you need help and definitely need to stay out of LTR’s!
What I felt like saying was, ‘I’ve produced mythird child and my sixth novel since I last saw you. Aren’t either of those things more important, more interesting, than my size?’ But no – my waist looked smaller! Forget the kid and the book: finally, something to celebrate!
Peru has been selling fresh frog juice for the last 15 years, and some locals drink it every day because they say it gives them strength.
Julian Tuwim
(I’m lying. We have proms, but they’re called “formals”. Didn’t go to mine, although a girlfriend dragged me to hers, and it was DEATHHHHH)
Ina May Gaskin: To begin with, women may easily desire the impossible—that every baby can survive if we apply enough technology and expensive medication. Too many have been seduced into thinking this is true. Women have been infantilized to a great degree, another factor that hasn’t helped. We can’t count how many women fell for the line that their sex lives would be enhanced by having a cesarean instead of a vaginal birth on the grounds that the vagina through which a baby has passed has been stretched out and ruined. I just spoke this morning with an Israeli woman who had a c-section for her full gestation twins 9 years ago and still grieves about the loss of the body she once had. Her figure is beautiful—that’s not the problem. But lovemaking has been painful for her ever since the surgery, and no surgeon can tell her why or fix her. And she knows that her surgery wasn’t an emergency but more a product of her doctor’s discomfort with the possibility that her second twin might be breech.
It's time I let you go
Elder abuse victims often live in silent desperation, fearing retaliation from their abusers. Many times, it takes the courage of a family member or loved one to take action and stop the abuse. Earlier this summer, Senior Community Centers staff shared information on recognizing and preventing elder abuse:
HMAM
Afternoon all
No lie. Right there, on the bus to the Cheddar Caves.
Now we are thinking about our next project, which we hope will be another book - called something like 'Flights of Fancy' - again two pieces by each member and the proceeds of this one going to our local Air Ambulance, which runs on contributions from the public. I have written one possible piece and this morning I had another idea just as I awoke. Isn't it strange how ideas can pop into one's head in that moment between sleeping and waking? So when I have finished the blog today and read a few of yours, I shall begin my next piece - it will be called
That’s why it’s a good idea to include something like grapefruit seed extract (not grapefruit essential oil, which is completely different) in any formulation that has water. It has been shown to be effective against a wide range of bacteria, fungi, and molds even in relatively low concentrations. The down side is that grapefruit seed extract can be toxic to humans, so should not be taken internally except under careful guidance of a qualified professional.
Thanks for stopping over for a look into my favorite room in our home. If you are visiting from Melissa's, please let me know you were here so I can be sure to stop over for a visit.
The scrapping community here in Australia has once again shown how wonderful and supportive it is and that is comforting to see.
It must be because she is such a nice lady.
Swindon Town have been promoted and will be wanting to win the league in their next fixture at home to Port Vale.
Dana Smith
Tommie Sanders, the artist and creator behind has this to say about her creations: "I would describe my jewelry as fun, colorful, affordable, and most importantly Art. The pieces I make are made to be a fashion accessory, but fashion is Art. Everything I make is a part of me, and what is most important to me is that the jewelry I make is unique, and one of a kind. I would like my customers to know that by purchasing a piece of jewelry from me, they are purchasing a one of a kind piece that no one else will ever be able to buy. They will always be the only one with that exact pair of earrings, or necklace, bracelet ...etc. Beads may be similar, but they are never exactly alike, especially those that are handmade or pulled from the earth. I love using my handmade polymer clay beads, and stone beads for that very reason."
it all would end
Maybe if we not only let our representatives know about our concerns, but also that we appreciate when they take an action that benefits everyone, we can encourage the type of positive change we want to see in the world.
8. Underneath 5.17 (30/60)
When a reality TV crew descends upon the bakery, her simple summer job gets even more complicated. Maddie could become the Bakery Network's next breakout star, if she can handle the heat of being cast as a show villain. Drew has an alternate idea: run away from everything, with him and his sexy tousled hair. She decides to take the leap, but when she finds out Drew's been hiding a shocking secret, Maddie looks down at her packed suitcase and takes a moment to think. She could fly off to Australia with a guy she hardly knows, or she could pick up her suitcase and hit him with it.
Following a review of both the technology and the relevant law, Mr Justice Kitchin concluded on the evidence that NewzBin clearly knew that its facility was used mainly by its members for the unauthorised downloading of infringing copies of the claimants' films. He then turned to Fox's action, which was based on the following:
Corporate Insider Transactions
But, I can't imagine that I would run to them before I would run to you. How could I? I am hoping that is something God will understand. And I'm hoping that I am ok for feeling that way. It's complicated I guess. That's the only way I know how to explain it.
After reading over the recipe, I eyeballed the short ingredient list and noted that most of the prep and baking is done in a single tatin pan or skillet. I'm already loving this recipe! I opted to make a mini tarte tatin, halving the recipe and using a 6 inch cast iron skillet.
Janet McTeer, Albert Nobbs
Do I have criticisms of myself? um, no doy. I always will.
Firstly, I’d like to apologise for my lack of activity on here! I’ve got a lot of uni work right now, so I may not post much for a while…
The last 11 months have been painful, some days absolutely unbearable. But I’m getting stronger.
There are several approaches to dealing with such circumstances during the holiday season full of family activities and/or work parties where alcohol is going to be served. My suggestion is to take your own preference of non-alcoholic beverage. OR drink non-alcoholic beverages that are served there at the event. My all time favorite is the Shirley Temple drink! I bring the ingredients with me...Ginger ale and a jar of cherries (with the cherry juice still in it). Simple and easy.
The swirly smooch between Eric Stoltz and Mary Stuart Masterson in Some Kind of Wonderful is, in my opinion, the best onscreen kiss in movie history. Well, that intimate moment between Christian Slater and Samantha Mathis has to be the best non-kiss in movie history. Their gaping mouths linger, as if they were about to inhale one another whole, but their lips don't actually touch. It's an extremely provocative scene, full of adolescent desire and sexual frustration. Oh, and the fact that both actors are topless in the scene probably helped in the sizzle department. This sense of longing is continued the very next day when Mark and Nora meet up on the HHH campus and proceed to go through the same mouth lingering machinations.
“What about the other 27 states like Michigan, nobody is talking about them?” he says.
Idea from the new Cookbook Jamie Oliver’s Food Escapes
The improvement of the blacks in body and mind, in the first instance of their mixture with the whites, has been observed by every one, and proves that their inferiority is not the effect merely of their condition of life. We know that among the Romans, about the Augustan age especially, the condition of their slaves was much more deplorable than that of the blacks on the continent of America. The two sexes were confined in separate apartments, because to raise a child cost the master more than to buy one. Cato, for a very restricted indulgence to his slaves in this particular, took from them a certain price. But in this country the slaves multiply as fast as the free inhabitants. Their situation and manners place the commerce between the two sexes almost without restraint. The same Cato, on a principle of economy, always sold his sick and superannuated slaves. He gives it as a standing precept to a master visiting his farm, to sell his old oxen, old wagons, old tools, old and diseased servants, and every thing else become useless…. The American slaves cannot enumerate this among the injuries and insults they receive. It was the common practice to expose in the island Esculapius, in the Tyber, diseased slaves, whose cure was like to become tedious. The emperor Claudius, by an edict, gave freedom to such of them as should recover, and first declared that if any person chose to kill rather than expose them, it should be deemed homicide. The exposing them is a crime of which no instance has existed with us; and were it to be followed by death, it would be punished capitally. We are told of a certain Vedius Pollio, who, in the presence of Augustus, would have given a slave as food to his fish, for having broken a glass. With the Romans, the regular method of taking the evidence of their slaves was under torture. Here it has been thought better never to resort to their evidence. When a master was murdered, all his slaves, in the same house, or within hearing, were condemned to death. Here punishment falls on the guilty only, and as precise proof is required against him as against a freeman. Yet notwithstanding these and other discouraging circumstances among the Romans, their slaves were often their rarest artists. They excelled too in science, insomuch as to be usually employed as tutors to their masters’ children. Epictetus, Terence, and Phaedrus, were slaves. But they were of the race of whites. It is not their condition then, but nature, which has produced the distinction. Whether further observation will or will not verify the conjecture, that nature has been less bountiful to them in the endowments of the head, I believe that in those of the heart she will be found to have done them justice. That disposition to theft with which they have been branded, must be ascribed to their situation, and not to any depravity of the moral sense. The man, in whose favour no laws of property exist, probably feels himself less bound to respect those made in favour of others. When arguing for ourselves, we lay it down as a fundamental, that laws, to be just, must give a reciprocation of right; that, without this, they are mere arbitrary rules of conduct, founded in force, and not in conscience: and it is a problem which I give to the master to solve, whether the religious precepts against the violation of property were not framed for him as well as his slave? And whether the slave may not as justifiably take a little from one, who has taken all from him, as he may slay one who would slay him? That a change in the relations in which a man is placed should change his ideas of moral right or wrong, is neither new, nor peculiar to the colour of the blacks. Homer tells us it was so 2600 years ago. Jove fix’d it certain, that whatever day makes man a slave, takes half his worth away.
The point of this discussion is to emphasize the value of opposition as well as the discernment to distinguish between the good and the bad. Simply abstaining from all forms of aggression is not the answer and inevitably develops into a failure to relate to society. Life is challenging. Taking away that natural development is hazardous to early development and is not naturally remedied in the complexities of adulthood. If we as a society desire to cultivate mature and well rounded adults, we shouldn’t be so quick to shelter them from the value of opposition.
They were standing with a group of people at a party when a man who was denied entry came back with a gun and started shooting, police said.
If science, and this includes psychology, ever has a motive, it should only be to better humanity. That’s it.
(That's John in the red and my brother, Ben.)
Everyone was good with the eggplant. It had good flavor that I think would have developed had I marinaded it longer. And it wasn't too spicy either, so the Mrs liked it. The Boy had The Squeeze over and she didn't care much for it. But then again - she goes out with The Boy.
Lastly (and I realize this is probably not a turn-off for most of the reading audience), Twilight vampires are just too…nice. They don’t burst into flame in the sun — nope, they just get even prettier with their sparkly skin. They can even stroll around outside, perfectly unharmed and unsparkly, on a cloudy day! (Although I have to say, I think sparkly vampires are marginally better than vampires who avoid bursting into flame by wearing copious amounts of sunblock).
In my case, I took longer to figure out how to do this than anybody I’ve ever met. It takes a while. It’s going to take you a while. It’s normal to take a while. And you just have to fight your way through that.
The next day she had a FIT! She told me I was disgusting and that she knew I must have had sex. (Let me just say that she has been very forthright with the fact that she has sex with her boyfriend and has an IUD because of this.) She said that she didn’t expect me to stop dating, but that I should not be having sex and that I am a MOTHER. Lordy. I pointed out that she has sex with her boyfriend, but because I am a MOTHER somehow there is a different standard. And then I pointed out that I had sex quite often (while she was in the house) when I was married, but apparently THAT is ok too. But, an unmarried mother is NOT supposed to have sex until her children are grown and out of the house.
This is such a simple cake yet very buttery and rich. I love the smell of cake in my house. It make me feel very happy. If you like simple cakes, please try this pound cake. It is so easy and very tasty.
13. I see beauty everywhere I go.
Created in 1989 by Rachel Ashwell, Shabby Chic’s practical & timeless style marries great design with casual ease. This vintage-inspired collection embraces the beauty of imperfection & the comforts of home. Shop an inviting array of relaxed accents & fill each room with flair & elegance.
a big pot with a lid (I used a 5 qt dutch oven and it was perfect)
When reading for our recent PitchMadness, we noticed the entries that didn't make it to the agent match was because the first words weren't hooking us. There wasn't a unique element to pull us in, the setting was right but the action was too familiar, or the story started in the wrong place. So we decided to do another workshop focusing solely on the opening page.
-stiff clothesline by Brock.
Cricut - A Child's Life - cut images at 3 inches boy in Light Brown, Girl in White
So, why we need real authentic Sushi in US?
I hope you all have a great weekend!
The list keeps getting longer. So far I've remembered Fannie Flagg, Laurie Halse Anderson, John Dominic Crossan, Marcus Borg, Masha Hamilton, Theda Perdue, Madeleine L'Engle, Robert Hicks, Susan Gregg Gilmore, Paul Von Ward, Janisse Ray, Christopher Paul Curtis, and Avi. That's a baker's dozen (thirteen, in other words).
If you love wildlife, I highly suggest you take a trip out to see Circle B Bar Reserve. Take the kids and their bicycles; pack a picnic lunch or just grab and camera (and lots of batteries). You will not be disappointed!
Back in January we did the Daniel fast and I really was so impressed with how much better I felt in eating clean non-processed foods. And the time has come to really start incorporating that into everyday life.
After getting back on the ship we got in the jacuzzi and got some ice cream and fresh fruit (which was one of the best things about the cruise). That night we had planned on going to the karaoke event and the white party event as well as a 2 for 1 martini event. After having martini’s we went to karaoke. That was a funny moment because one of my friends actually did it by herself. She usually would not do it but hey, we were on vacation and we weren’t going to see these people again.
As ME writer Jodi Bassett states, “It is very common for severely affected patients to spend 2 months, 6 months, 12 months or even YEARS or longer recovering from a hospital trip.
Publication info:
You Shook Me
The rise of corporatism in rich democracies signals some important changes in political economy, especially as it relates to social policy matters. For one, corporatist decision-making tends to result in the blurring of private and public sectors. For instance, labor unions might be so strongly affiliated with specific government bureaus and ministries that their “private” status is debatable.
Shatung: It is getting very difficult for me to hunt to feed myself and my family. Our landscape is changing. Everything in my world is changing. What was once a perfect place for me no longer is. There is less ice for me to live on. I am frightened for my species and for our world. We are a very gentle form but we need our home. We are being chased out of areas where we once lived with great abundance. There are man made structures where we once hunted and roamed. When will this stop? Will our land be given back to us?
Predicting cancer
Boys like that, Joey and Ray and Little Man, they’re the future. The way it’s going to be.
And also surprised that that quote is so famous when a few pages later we have Toad saying
Not sure which challenges yet, will have to update when I have finished my latest colouring order. Have a great Sunday :-)
"O.K. then clever clogs", said I. "So why, since living in this house has all the money literally come in through the front door and disappeared out of the back, when before we lived here we were reasonably comfortable, for a little while at least?"
Trench dress, Forever 21 (overdyed by me). Plaid jumper, Worthington (vintage swap). Gray tights, Merona. Red belt, Xhilaration. Gray slouchy boots, Worthington. Gold droplet earrings, thrifted. Red patent headband.
When I was a teenager, my favourite author was Robert Cormier. He broke new ground in the 70s when he published his debut novel, The Chocolate War, and, along with other notable authors such as S E Hinton, radicalised the young adult genre. His writing was thought-provoking, edgy, daring; he relished tackling dark and difficult scenarios; his endings were often bleak and uncompromising; and Cormier went on to become one of the most celebrated YA authors – as well as one of the most banned by US librarians. He had a talent for taking the most outrageous or controversial subjects and exploring them with a brutal honesty, avoiding preaching, moralising, or sensationalism. I’ve been looking for a modern day author to inherit his crown for some time – and I may have just found that writer in Tabitha Suzuma.
* He had a club foot. At the time because he was so popular, people actually would walk with a limp in honor of Byron--he made it fashionable.
I talked with him and Victor, his manager, and now, I need him to send me some songs for the second part of the discuss, the one I will have tomorrow on Skype with my dear boys.
This blog post is partly a kind of “in memoriam” for Cos Desmond, with my most vivid memories of him, but it is also to commemorate those others who were involved in the same stuggle against apartheid, ethnic cleansing, and the forced removals that took place to implement that grotesque ideology — Elliot Mngadi, Enock Mnguni, Mike Ndlovu, John Aitchison, Chris Shabalala, and others.
Life with two has been interesting and quite a challenge at times. With the hubs being in Baltimore, it's been a big adjustment for all of us. I'm trying to juggle finding time to spend with Abby and meeting the needs of a new baby (on not much sleep). Abby is fighting for attention, which sometimes leads to acting out or not listening. She's definitely Mommy's little helper (like we all thought she'd be) but sometimes it's a little overwhelming.
You see, I began to question my faith. I mean, if I thought these unholy things how could I call myself a Christian? Reading that article helped me to realized I wasn’t alone.
back home’ meant. Without missing a beat, he said, ‘Yes, Sahana already explained to me. It is get your S back home. S stands for self, so they are saying ‘get your SELF back home!’ Oh, the joy! Mama made a mental note to give the girl an extra hug for her presence of mind.
the cornstalk are smooth and elegant.
It was in the always in the script for Joe to the little dance step; I wanted him to do a softshoe, but Sam Witwer showed me he could moonwalk. I’m thinking, great! Sam’s an incredible guy because he’s got physical power and he is so limber and he can look really tough and really scary and then boom! In the alley when he’s walking in front of the camera and he’s doing the Michael Jackson thing. The guy can do anything, so I was very blessed.
Willow has spent most of her life as her mother's sidekick in a popular Las Vegas hypnotism show. So when she and her mom move back to their sleepy southern hometown to start over, she thinks she's in for a life of quiet normalcy. Except that her new life turns out to be anything but, when she kinda sorta hypnotizes Quinton, the hottest guy on the football team, to fall madly, deeply, head over heels in love with her. But what started out as an innocent way to make her best friend, Max, jealous soon gets way out of hand, and Willow begins to wonder if the mind - and more importantly, the heart - is something you can really control.
Now married with four children, she is devastated that the lack of governmental funding will allow her to become the professional she wants to be.
-21.908677 , 114.131806
Our explanations must now rest on two major foundations: most Neolithic genes were native, but the major domesticates were exotic. Small-scale rather than continent-wide migrations are the best way to integrate these into one model. Agriculture in a region may have been introduced by immigrants, but that does not mean that the immigrants carried mainly Near Eastern genes (Richards 2003; Rowley-Conwy 2004b; Zvelebil 2005). The LBK, for example, originated in the Carpathian Basin; the population that moved westward emerged there carrying a complex mix of European and Near Eastern mtDNA and no doubt picking up more as it moved.
The point of this text is to allow people access to the tools with which they might take culture to pieces and see how it operates. Understanding signification creates more effective communicators in any media industry, and sharper contemporary artists. In my experience, students who are just starting out either leap right through cultural artefacts, searching for ‘deep’ meanings, which may ultimately be fugitive, or they remain on the thinnest of surfaces, tending to naturalize them. ‘Depth’ is a misleading term to use here though. What Storey often does is account for the way any one cultural artefact brings other significatory surfaces into play. In his example of recent car advertising, he shows how the automobile is often presented as solitary, rather than just another atom of congestion, essentially using discourse analysis to show that what is missing is just as important, sometimes, as what is presented or re-presented. The car advert reveals the myth of the individual, lone vehicle. This is a point Storey makes in passing, to illustrate something else, but it alerts me to the usefulness and scope of this text. It also serves, for me, as a metaphor for the doing of cultural studies, which should link isolated objects up to the wider social world and its issues.
Now I know what you’re thinking, I did make a stand here and there. I engaged in protests. I wrote songs about hearing ‘the ghettos cry at night,” and that “there was no life in Guatemala.” I sang songs of hope and rebellion, but they were just songs sung to a few thousand people at the most. Made no visible impact at all. Just sayin.’
I wonder what people out there are reading, what’s really got them excited to pick up a book. I am definitely looking forward to Matt Bell’s “Cataclysm Baby.” The press for it so far is awesome.
The term 'hot as balls' actually means something. While the human body is 98.6 degrees F (what, that's like 600 for you Celsius users?) testicles hang away from the body in order to protect their precious cargo. Balls, in fact, do have a measurable temperature. Whatever lucky guy they tested to get this information, I do not know.
Set in modern day, TIME TOURISM is a YA fantasy novel of approximately 125,000 words. It stands alone as a single book, but has series potential. Thank you for your time and consideration.
16. Jazz in Your Face - Erick Morillo / 3:55
Madrid, Toulouse, child gang rape and murder, sharia, desecration of graves, threats, intimidation, harrassment, abuse of our troops, gang assault on males, halal, George Galloway, Charlene and Paige.
this sea oats photo was taken one of the last times we were there... almost three years ago to the day...
I tried to get past him again, my hands holding a pile of plates, my shoulder and elbow and hip prepared to help get me through the narrow space.
Should you program out your meals upfront, you will discover that getting correct nourishment while next your weight loss prepare is much simpler. Pack your pre-prepared meals in the cooler so they will probably be obtainable in any way moments.
It was only on March 1 that the family of four had moved into the house in Toms River, NJ. But they tell the Asbury Park Press that they immediately noticed they may not be alone:
is a complex film. It is also an amazing film dealing with the good and the evil in each of us. There are sections of the film that can be revolting to a viewer and there are others that offer spectacular beauty. This inherent Janus face of this movie is probably one reason that it will not fulfil every cineaste’s concept of ideal cinema. The film, when viewed in its totality and analyzed for both its content and its style, is both powerful and rewarding. While handing over the Golden Lion, it is no surprise that the US film director Darren Aronofsky and Chairman of the Venice Film Festival 2011 Jury said of the film Faust “There are films that change you forever and this is one of them.”
Watercolour.
After Congress lifted a ban, horses can now be slaughtered for consumption. Next on Md Donald's menu: The McStallion.
(Caveat: Not all links provide primary sources, so it’s hard to verify their data.)
Poor typesetter. The big blocks are the classes (second, third etc period) and breaks. The last few are “discussion”, “cleaning” and “afterschool”. The top row are the signs of the Chinese zodiac that correspond to that time. (Snake, Horse, Ram, Monkey…) The bottom row are the start and end times for classes. The figure that comes and takes the book is the character for “someone” (某 soregashi). The signs around “someone” are “borrow” (借 kari(ru)), “return” (返 kae(su)) and “go home” (帰 kae(ru)).
Florida, lovely Florida!!
Another reason why Krútt is so hard to pin down is that it is not at all clear why a lot of the art so described should be considered cute or childishly innocent, as the word would imply it is. Think of Björk and Sigur Rós with their advanced tonal techniques and hyper-intellectual associations. Think of Gabríela Friðriksdóttir’s dark musings on mythological origins, gnomic earth spirits and the lurking dangers of the nursery. Think of the Icelandic Love Corporation’s performances with their sharp critique of the art-world division between consumers and providers, and of its roundabout reinforcement of conventional gender roles. Think of Ragnar Kjartansson sitting alone in his crumbling countryside dance hall, picking despondently at an out-of-tune guitar, a phantom in his own opera.
some links work, others are “down” but still included to prove they DID exist. These things have a way of disappearing off the net, so download them and MIRROR them on other file sharing sites if you can.
On Tuesday Ms. A, Ms J. (good grief, do I sound like Tyra Banks?), and I had lunch at one of Vancouver’s newer food carts – Mom’s Grilled Cheese.
This is a little box made using the "Pillow Box" die and the Big shot. I cut it from Very Vanilla card stock and then embossed it with the Perfect Polka Dots embossing folder. I made the large pansy using one of the hearts from the new Heats Framelits on the Big Shot. I cut 2 hearts from Concord Crush, 2 from Wisteria Wonder and 1 from Daffodil Delight. I then cut the hearts in half and rounded the edge that wasn't rounded already. Then I used my black Stampin' Write Marker and drew the veins on each petal. Then I adhered them together with SNAIL and layered them together. I added a Large Pearl Basic Jewel in the center. The Pear Pizzazz leaves are made using the Blossom Building Punch.
I accidently threw away my schedule for this week.
Welcome to those of you who have just recently joined us here, I hope you enjoy the bounty of inspiration that is shared here each week.
06/29 - Saskatoon, SK Credit Union Centre
With fists shaking to the sky, maybe you ask God, “Why won’t you just tell me already?” And you know what? He answers. Just not in ways you always expect. God likes to take his time, meaning he cannot be rushed. We, as selfish, fast-paced human beings, usually just end up losing patience and eventually losing hope that God will ever come through and finally answer our pleas and requests.
Claudia.
Admiral Walter F. Doran, USN (Ret.) Commander in Chief, U.S. Pacific Fleet (’02-’05)
Short burst of stress helps us deal with a crisis in our life, this is known as the fight or fight reaction
Did he ever tell me how much my chicken was? Did I PAY for that?? (At this point, I'm still not sure. I'm hoping it will come to me tomorrow which, of course, I'm certain will entail a trip into Tupelo to go pay for chicken I was too tired to eat taking time I really don't have to take. Sigh...)
Tools: Spellbinders classic circle +scalloped,
D. Boon feels like a number:
Another feature of these shoes is the durability. These shoes can last long without decreasing the benefits they can give to your feet. You can use these shoes for everyday activities. By the way, if you are looking for casual shoes, Saucony also have them. You can look for different designs on their Jazz O, which is designed for everyday use. You can visit ZBSports.com if you want to buy some casual shoes.
Thanks to JL, AJ, and EM for being three of the nicest people in publishing and sending me some AMAZING books. Thanks to all of the other publicists who've sent me books too! :)
After it was all over and despite the confusion threading my family, friends, and some audience members that I didn't even know, my youngest child - CJ, my 8-yr-old with Apraxia of Speech - said, "But Ma, at least we all know and we're all here supporting you."
However, I think Ruby makes important work, potentially highly effective work. I have no doubt that Ruby is a major artist – I happen to think he is a brilliant artist. Here’s why.
I’ll wish I was him ’cause those words are mine
In the new issue of Doctor Who Magazine, every reader has the opportunity to download a FREE Doctor Who audio episode from Big Finish Productions! Yes, Tom Baker has reprised his role as the Fourth Doctor, alongside Louise Jameson as Leela - and you can hear them in Part One of The Foe from the Future.
Anyways, how am I spending my birthday?
We traveled to Montana this year for Thanksgiving.
The Decline of the American Empire
Yes, I blog for a living. But I also get stuck for ideas, especially for my own blog. (As you can see from the dates of my last few posts.) It's not always easy to sit down and find something to say.
"I made a cartoon that went viral and I am not going with it. Many other folks have used my cartoon to start sites, etc. Please go to them as I am a private person who draws stuff," she writes.
Well we are now in August... where has this year gone?
1 T soy sauce
Appellation: Stellenbosch
23. Fall for Anything Courtney Summers
My flowers are not true to life having more fantasy in their creation, or should I say artistic license.
-Bashful
Let the chaos begin!
A laugh riot which will directly take you on a fun toll of gags and love affair, where Imran Khan falls in love with Katrina, who plays Imran’s brother’s would be bride! The movie started rolling in the month of September last year in New Delhi followed by schedules in the locales of North Indian places of Patiala, Mussoorie and Chandigarh respectively. At the same time Agra and Delhi were also targeted for shooting and the scenes got completed on April 15. Mere Brother Ki Dulhan will be hitting multiplexes somewhere in the middle of 2011.
In the weeks following the Eid al Miloud, pilgrimage celebrations (moussem-s) are held all over Morocco at the shrines of local awliya saints. Possibly the biggest of these celebrations is the moussem in Meknes for L-Hadi ben Aissa, eponym of the Aissawa brotherhood. Pilgrims from across the region and across the country descend on Meknes for a 2 weeks of devotion and renewal, and nights of trance music.
You know what I say, more power to 'em. I say be as creative as can be. Up the octane all you can, just don't brag so much about it that they change the tax structure. Also, I'm thinking that the pendulum will swing and some brewers are going to make some very very good 3% ABV beer. We need some session beer that just killer as well. I enjoy beer, and a lot of times I just want a nice beer with my food, but I don't want to visit a hospital after a couple 12 ouncers. I mean come on man. Let's get these brothas some low alcohol beer that's in the 4 star range. I know you'll think of something.
BUT ALL YOU WANT IS SOME MONEY FROM ME TONIGHT
It's been gloomy and rainy for so long that I can't remember what the sun looks like.
This evening my mom and dad were over at the house. They’re visiting from Texas. Usually they stay with me but this time with all what I’m doing with Gypsy it was going to be too much so I told them they had to stay at a hotel. They weren’t too happy about that and didn’t really understand, but I know it was the best decision. When they came over tonight I had Gypsy on the buddy system and was rewarding her for her impulse control. She had to sit for please as well. There was one point where she was with me on the couch. I was on one end and my dad was on the other. My dad is really the only man she knows and is slightly scared of him but was doing well and getting pet. Apollo came over and Gypsy gave him “the look.” It was too much for me to verbally get her out of that so I had to physically interrupt her look at him. If I had left it she probably would have reacted against him like before. When I interrupted my mom asked me what was wrong and without having to go into a huge long explanation, I just said she was giving some stress signals. Yes, I wish she would have looked back at me for guidance. I really don’t like that she would have reacted if I didn’t interrupt. But again, that’s why my parents are staying at a hotel. The change in dynamics would throw her off and as much as she loves them, it changes too much at one time and I think it creates some anxiety. I’m glad I made the decision I did and still had to ability to watch Gypsy’s body language carefully enough with the distractions I’m faced with.
pipe relining. The combination of a stronger liner with an epoxy
Mash avocadoes with fork, add sour cream (I like my guacamole creamy, you can leave out the sour cream if you prefer pure avocado), add lemon juice and seasonings to taste.
On returning to the Congo, I mention this nugget of astronomical news to the manager of the safari camp.
Afghanistan may be the graveyard of empires, but Iraq is home to a graveyard sense of humor. Iraqis wonder aloud whether the U.S. and Britain would have invaded Iraq if its main export had been cabbages instead of oil.
And so, we have justified jadedness.
When I was growing up, we watched the Disney movie and/or Mutual of Omaha's Wild Kingdom, and tried our best not to watch Lawrence Welk. We also drank pop with our popcorn. Well, we have traded the soda (I refuse to buy it and rarely let the kids drink it) for water or milk, and keep the tube turned off in favor of playing games. That is the most fun part.
Delete the original text from a reply message.
It seems logical to expect that a church led by a team of Louie Giglio, Matt Redman, and Chris Tomlin will attract a lot of attendees. How will you be sure your congregation is growing spiritually?
It suddenly hit me that 2014 is two years away. In two years the past 14 years will be done. The wars will, technically, be done. Any remaining foreign forces operating in Afghanistan after that will be as a support to the Afghan military.
“For false christs and false prophets will arise and perform signs and wonders, to lead astray, if possible, the elect.” (Mark 13:22)
We hope you are inspired by the work our designers have done this week, some of the images they have used are brand new and are available now in the Digi Stamp Shop, pop over there now for a look and pick up a new freebie which you might find useful for your Valentine's day makes!
is, here signifies the superessentiality or being-beyond-being of secret, the horizonless ‘negation of the negation’ or ‘third’ domain that is the infinite with of the alone with the Alone. Black in Black signifies the convertible mutual interpenetration of the black interior of man (the individuated alone) and black universe or the opacity of the horizonless Real (the universal Alone). The identity of this irresolvably double auto-interiority of man and black is the truly limitless solitude or lonely pan-explosion of place wherein all is within without collapse. The definitive or limitless interiority of black is the meta-place of the One-in-One which
- 2 cloves of garlic, crushed
j/ A foreigner having internal transfer within an enterprise, in the service scope in the commitment service table of Vietnam with World Trade Organization with 11 services, including: business service; information service; construction service; distribution service; education service; environmental service; financial service; health service; tourism service; service of entertainment culture and transportation service;
Crying in the sun
Optional: 1/2 cup oatmeal
LCD 2.5-inch
Awww man, snowflakes falling in October! Bundled and shivering, you could see my smile from the moon! I love the cold, crisp air - it wakes your ass right up! Some see sneezes, I see sweaters. Something had to make up for the horrid & unmissed humidity here. Still I'm readjusting to the rain and actual "weather." Hehe! I'm still expecting perma sunshine. Perhaps the lack of meat on my bones will have me singing a different tune come late November, but I doubt it. :P I'm not physically equipped for these chilly temps, but I'm prepping for winter already! Now I'll get some good use out of what remains of my sweater stash. I thought I was inspired before...WheeEEE! I've missed my seasonal bundling...I made need to be sedated - the excitement is killing me.
horseman of iron.
full of history. It also has a traditional, market hall.
Breakfast: Cheese Grits (150 calories)
You've got a skull, baby, you've got a spine.
Look out of the window Mr Aylard doesn’t your statement seem just a little bit crass? There is your raw material falling out of the sky, free and gratis. You do not have to pay for any of it. When we have a dry spell what action do you take? restriction! You cut the usage, impose hose pipe bans, put standpipe’s in the streets. But what do you invest to increase capacity of supply, do you build new reservoirs? No of course not, better to drain them and sell the land for housing. Increase underground storage? No Way! How about stopping the leaks from your distribution system? Hundreds of Millions of gallons soak away into the ground every day because you do not maintain it properly and what does OFFWAT do to regulate this monopoly industry? very little. The same people all living in one another’s pockets.
Here's a pretty card I created featuring one of my favorite flowers, the pansy! My pansy background paper was made by my daughter, Lee, who is a computer graphics artist. She took images from vintage postcards and arranged them for me, and I just printed it out. I just love the paper! Wait until you see the rose background paper she did as well!!
As far as I can find out, Annemarie Selinko was an Austrian journalist and political writer, married to a Danish husband. They were living in Denmark when the war broke out, but fled from the Gestapo to Sweden, where they worked with the Swedish Red Cross assisting refugees. She used aspects of her experiences in Desiree, her last novel, which tells the story of a silk merchant's daughter who was once engaged to Napoleon and later married one of his Marshals, subsequently becoming Desideria, Queen of Sweden.
can of black beans, and my
Reading your April 8, 2008, blog about narrative nonfiction, I wondered about the storyline for nonfiction, e.g. The Perfect Storm, In Cold Blood, Jon Krakauer's work, and other well-known stories.
choco chippy's
When I used to come to New York to visit Josh, I thought people must be crazy to go to movies with all of these amazing and wonderful experiences to be had. “Why in the world are there so many movie theaters in this city?” I would ask myself as I passed dozens in one weekend. Now that I live here, however, I find that going to a movie every once in a while makes me feel at home. After all, that was the hottest date spot/hang out/pre-teen gossip/better not get left out place ever.
After two lots of suds and lots of rinsing I was amazed to discover that this little dog was meant to be white, and as far as I could tell was a West Highland Terrier. I closed the cubicle door as I switched off the shower and he shook emphatically several times, and then waited to be let out, his tail now wagging. I dried him off, making a game of it; hiding him under the towel and then watching as he scrambled out, rubbing up against it next to the wall. I laughed to see him so carefree and playful.
But I'm also overwhelmed by all the people, mainly tourists, and it's not even peak tourism season yet.
1/2 cup frozen peas
“Hold on,” shouted Violet. The moans grew louder. She reached down and tore the side of her skirt high up her thigh and peeled off the pantyhose. Laurel did the same and was glad to be rid of the hated stockings.
On through endless night
Metallic Card: From my stash
Sit and I wonder sometimes
Is that a sin?
I've made some blog awards of my own. Partly because I keep seeing the same ones floating around the blogosphere, but mostly because I'm off my meds. These were made up on a whim, (which will explain a few things once you scroll down), and specifically designed so I wouldn't find out later that I had stolen the image/likeness/idea of someone else would would want to sue me or throw tomatoes at my house, or whatever the punishment is for being an unintentional copycat. If these exist already, I appologize. And I'll give you the number of my psychiatrist. Now without further ado I bring you:
Okay, here's a pic this morning during daylight hours. For those who have been asking about Mr. Max, this is his fave spot to be, furring up the ottoman. ;) I have another little update planned for this room...hope to share it soon. (If you're new to reading BNOTP, you'll find the full transformation of this room from boy's bedroom to home office/sewing room/craft room in this post: Pottery Barn Bedford Office Renovation.)
Every Easter is such a special day for me. As I grow as a Christian, I think each year it becomes more meaningful to me. I tend to reflect on the past year and what God has taught me and brought me through. It brings me to tears (which isn't hard to do typically but it's even worse now that I'm PG!) to think of the many blessings I've received by following and trusting in Jesus and his death and resurrection. And the beauty of it is that it is a gift! No charge or requirement for membership. Just belief and faith that Jesus is who He says He is. It is just amazing to me how undeserving I am of His blessings and gift of eternal hope but yet He's included me into His family. And I long for the day when there will be no more sorrow or pain but only continuous praise of Jesus...maybe a tiny bit like Easter and Christmas!
In terms of improving things in the civil service, my personal view is that public servants who are on six figure salaries – in particular those who are decision-makers in large public sector organisations with big budgets, should have higher public profiles. The Coalition has tried to address this by forcing departments to publish departmental organograms (Search “organogram” at data.gov.uk) to show which civil servants are responsible for which functions. However, this does not deal with the issue of regular public scrutiny.
Then C.J., reading his script, sketched out several differences between the candidates, including Montgomery’s statement that “she has been a strong candidate for reform” and Boyland’s counter that “the state government is in desperate need of change, but nothing will be done unless we elect new representatives.”
As the name implies these creatures are true terrors of the desert. In addition to their immense size, strength and psionic ability they also possess an array of powerful magical abilities.
Needless to say, this pseudo-Islam which is being promoted by this Saudi sheikh, which dreads telling oppressors "you are oppressor" for fear of fitna is what makes adulterers and sodomites rule with an iron fist the land of Islam in Mecca and Madina and surrender Muslim sovereignty to the United States on a silver platter. They simply have a sheepish people that is told it is haram to criticize the decadent and oppressive rulers, let alone demonstrate against them. It is very much like the people of the Pharaoh who as the Quran said led his people to hellfire because they refused to rise up against him.
in your eyes
First things first.
It has some amazing woodwork that I want to feature, but the prior owners did some bad (and that's putting it nicely) work on this house that will take a major overhaul to undo. Just the thought of electric outlets in the bathroom or kitchen that doesn't look 40 years old makes me giddy with anticipation!
Moonstruck, Desert Sand & Bamboo ink
David Mabus aka Dennis Markuze, is a Canadian lunatic who for years has been attacking atheists and scientists in every public forum he could reach, and getting banned for it. His first target was James Randi and he has expanded his list of targets over the years to anyone who appears to reject theism. He even attacked me on my blog a couple of times. He is able to get around the banning by morphing his screen name and using internet cafes. His messages, which often include death threats, are always rambling and totally disjointed screeds that a twelve-year old in his mother’s basement might send, if the kid had no sense of shame.
I was quite excited at coming up with a Nonnette nouvelle. The combination of rose and roasted rhubarb jam has probably never been used before. This in conjunction with some delicious Cornish honey, ought to be irresistible, I thought. As we still had quite a bit of cake in the house from my recent Clandestine Cake Club event, I used half the normal quantities to make six rather than twelve individual cakes.
Like a chicken mound,
The nurses at St. Mary's were amazing! Everyone was so helpful and accommodating! All of the nurses were genuinely excited for us. They even got us a room so I could stay with the baby. It was a very special time!
There you have it and in 250 words exactly! Anyone else caught scratching their butt by someone who never should have seen you doing so?
Or you can purchase this Oriental one for $39.95
On Feb. 3, 1964, Civil Rights activists such as Bayard Rustin, who helped organize the Freedom Rides down south and the March on Washington in 1963, made the New York City school system the site of their next demonstration. They boycotted the schools for a day. More than 450,000 students didn't go to school, and picketers marched across the Brooklyn Bridge to demonstrate in front of the Board of Education building.
Because they will probably have sex one day. Hell, we expect people to have sex at some point in their lives. Virgins are simultaneously revered and suspect in our culture, depending on one’s age. Trying to scare youth away from sex is the worst possible tactic and only results in scared adults trying to work out their sexuality in the increasingly complex and uncharted modern romantic interactions.
Touch My Katamari
What particularly caught my eye on a quick skim was the overiding idea that ripples form as we intervene when using story based methods and therefore where best should we ‘drop our pebble’ to make these ripples deliver most impact.
Hey cute friends! I hope you're not tired of all my copy cat knock offs- cause I have yet another one to share today! I've had this guy saved on my "to do" list for months and months now. It's a retro clock that sells at both Ballard Designs and Restoration Hardware!
“On a scale of one to ten, with one being a slight pain and ten being the worst pain you’ve ever felt, how bad would you say it is?”
Weirdly enough, JP told me tonight at dinner that Roger, our contractor, made some mention about how I come across as intimidatingly smart. This shocked me because (1) I do not think I am at all intimidating for any reason and have actually worried in professional, opposing party type situations that I come off as too friendly and (2) the only conversations I've had with Roger involve measurements and picturing things that aren't yet built and I am absolutely terrible at that. We had to put a piece of paper on the floor and draw a diagram of our master shower from two different perspectives- that's how much I couldn't grasp the concept of our new bench. I think it must be because he's only seen me in suits and heels whereas he sees JP working in burnt orange basketball shorts and a t-shirt. The same burnt orange basketball shorts and t-shirt ever single day. I had to explain last night that "working from home" is not an excuse to forgo bathing and laundry.
When the wonderful Mumma has the square I will post a picture.
What particularly impresses me about "Narcopolis" is that Thayil's characters are so genuinely flawed but, simultaneously, so impressive and powerful and full of spirit. Though the novel's pages are riddled with the horrors of murder, addiction, and abuse, a three dimensional understanding is at all times portrayed: no action occurs without the reader's awareness of its underlying motives. We see, as the residents of Bombay see, that a "dying city" can elicit a human's most banal behavior, regardless of their efforts to stay strong.
By Julia Dankov
Gas prices are going up again. Why are so many people surprised? And why are they thinking we need to tap into the oil reserves? If we were to use all the oil in the reserve, what would happen if we really had an emergency?
Gifts are cool too.
Wilson also spoke about the Daleks multicoloured misstep: “I don’t think any of us would say that the multicoloured Daleks quite worked, but you’ve got to try new things. If you just repeat and repeat the show is in danger of stagnating.”
My Islam is Leonard Howell handing out photographs
green and sprawling before his house.
Limor
Stay tuned for the shower reveal!
Adding insult to injury, he was subsequently charged with assaulting a peace officer following the initial investigation by Windsor police, including Det.-Sgts. Paul Bridgeman and Patrick Keane.
God made fire for gathering friends together on cold winter evenings. I’m sure of it. I enjoyed conversation around not one, not two, but three fires this weekend, and I’m pretty sure I could go for it every night if such a thing were possible. Let’s have lots more this winter, shall we?
Labour's Fascist Election Strategy Exposed
Me: I wish I was born yesterday, so I believed you. Regardless, you wasted my time and made me feel worthless. Just for the record, I'm not a bad date. I'm fun, sometimes silly and an excellent conversationalist. I
I love my life and my life is good, but my life is messy as hell. It’s never been neat and tidy and I have no reason to expect that to change, but I don’t care. What I have within that messy life fraught with circumstances that would crush other is love, and joy, and freedom to be me—messy, happy, mostly peaceful me. I have God and my integrity, and I have found that’s all that I really need.
Power To My People!
If you want to quickly and effectively reduce costs in your organization, travel budgets can be significantly reduced, while getting the same scope of work (meetings) done by using technology. Phone and video conferencing can easily replace face-to-face meetings and the costs associated. Meeting in person may be the richest form of communication in cutting a deal or working collaboratively. However utilizing video conferencing or using Skype or other forms is more the standard and acceptable these days. As an entrepreneur you will have to make a careful decision on the appropriate forms of communication for the appropriate audience, while cognizant of the need for cost-effective methods.
My plan was to make some Ipoh hor fun (a dish derived from prawn noodles according to renowned food historian Lin Jin Cheng (林金城)- click here to read the article); but decided against a trip to Victoria Street just to get the rice noodles, using what I had in my pantry seemed like a much better idea on a very hot afternoon.
The day and the night follow each other around and around, never pausing and never tiring of their eternal journey. But there is only ever one day and one night – they never happen at the same time, and in some places they move at a different pace than others; but they are always two things permanently apart.
I would remind you that as our Prime Minister your primary duty is to put the interests of your country and your own people before the interests of a foreign people or ideology. I am of course talking about Islam here, more specifically sharia law, which is making rapid progress in Britain and the West. It is both astonishing and chilling that what was formerly considered haraam (forbidden under sharia law) only in Islamic countries is now equally considered haraam in Britain.
Book reviews include:
This new hospital at Dahej will bring up to the code, health and medical development in the city, which has been lackluster for a while. Irrespective of the tremendous industrial development that Dahej has been witnessing, there was only a primary health centre during emergencies. Besides, one had to travel 45 Km to Bharuch, with it being the nearest place with first- rate hospitals, to be treated. Below Poverty line (BPL) families will be availed of free treatment from this hospital at Dahej. Besides, patients who are registered at the primary health care centre can benefit from treatment, as it will be made available to them at nominal prices, being subsidized by upto 70%.
I used this great Hambo Stamps image and sentiment for my CAS card. It's base is a leftover cutout from picture frames I made last week. I'm beginning to refer to these as donut hole cards.
I had the opportunity yesterday to visit with the guys from Fire Station 95 in Bethel Island and if you have never seen the station, I suggest a visit because it’s a real eye opener of how much these guys do with very little to work with.
"Walkin' After Midnight" by Patsy Cline
To carry them a dream.
Yes, a real journal page. Last year, I got myself a smaller version of the Strathmore Visual Journal--it's a 5 x 8 size--so a little more manageable size. I have the mixed media one--I love the paper in this--you can do anything you want to it. And I decided to use all of these art supplies that I have, but have been afraid to touch, because I don't know how to use them. I've said this before....I always love when I'm making art for myself....I always like it (most of the time).
To begin, preheat your oven to 300 degrees.
Yet there is a minority view that the book is over-rated. Maxine Clarke, aka Petrona, wrote this critical but typically thoughtful and considered review, and others have also expressed serious doubts about the plausibility of the plot-line.
Today is my birthday and I'll be spending part of it in an airport by myself, headed home to the city I love. But I'll be leaving a part of my heart behind in this desert, because a tiny girl has stolen it with her chubby hands and won't give it back.
What you can't see is the SHIMMER. I tried nine ways to Easter Sunday to capture that with my camera, but no dice. But trust me, it's luminous and beautiful. I just have one word for this stuff.
Add the sugar and vinegar mixture and toss to combine everything evenly. Refrigerate for at least 6 hours (even better, overnight) before serving.
When I tell him it's my father's discharge papers from WWII, he says "Oh yeah?"- in that kind of faux enthusiasm of a generation mired in indifference- so I can tell right away he's not really that interested but the old man standing next to me says" Oh yeah?! like I just woke something up in him like he's the ancient mariner who no one listens to anymore.
Overall Height: 9.5"
I bought this plant three weeks ago. It was covered in buds, but had no flowers. I found it in the end of the season clearance isle for $4.99. A great deal I thought, so I bought it and hoped for the best.
Yeap, I joined another assignment/ contest/ challenge. Why not right? There are two things that inspire me; good ideas and good feedback. Which makes this one stop shopping, and I got plenty of words to spend.
And was that a tiny little fart I heard at the end of the bloopers?
We Have the Power of God’s Word to Exercise Our Authority
Bayer Advanced Aspirin 20 or 24 ct – $3
He said that could be explained, in part at least, because of the "very difficult national conditions" in which the ANC took power.
Colin Porter (English Democrats) 286 (14.1%)
But man, are organizing and storage components expensive! They add up quite quickly, especially if you're overhauling your entire home like I am. After hubby made me a delish quick dinner with store bought cannelloni one night, I was washing out the pasta tray to plop it in the recycling. I couldn't get over how thick and sturdy the plastic was. I was blown away with how similar it was to the black plastic drawer organizer I had recently purchased for my cosmetics drawer.
Did I just kill the mood for the new year..?
I mean let’s face it, he’s been in the bottom two almost every week since this season has started, so it didn’t really come as a shock to him. Apparently his samba on Monday didn’t woo the judges enough, an they gave him a total score of 19. Ouch!
The recent coalition government budget has succeeded in exposing the opportunism within the Labour benches… (or maybe its just incompetence?)
I asked the staff if they were going to do this on a regular basis, and they said they thought perhaps every other year. They'd had a lot of positive feedback, and I'm not surprised. There were several tables of books, and quite a variety of subjects, ranging from classical Greek art, through the Renaissance, to contemporary art, from paintings to glass to architecture, monographs and catalogues -- something for everyone!
I colored hae with Promarkers and Marvy markers
she may have them now.
Christianity is a Relationship, Not a Religion
I have hit a wormhole in the all encompassing baby retail industry - mobiles.
The Square Ones say woof !
Out in the woods stood such a pretty little fir tree. It grew in a good place, where it had plenty of sun and plenty of fresh air. Around it stood many tall comrades, both fir trees and pines.
so we proceed without direction
Whoo…okay, I’m safe. I found another house. A new beginning. A new fresh start.
Demetrius Mercer is a fighter vampire for the de Nouviant family who spends his days hunting a rival vampire family for killing his beloved Rosaline. When he learns Jade Smith knows his life story and is publishing it on the Internet for all to see, he must uncover who she is and how she knows so much about his past--before she exposes him and endangers his entire family.
Oh, those Tudors! We can't get enough of them. Whole bookshelves have been filled with them, acres of film consecrated to their antics. How badly behaved they were. What Machiavellian plottings and betrayals. Will we never tire of the imprisonments, torturings, entrail-windings, and burnings at the stake?l
In a real pinch you could even drop the beef part of it and serve some corn or corn bread with the beans and rice instead since corn and beans together make a complete protien! :) I have done this several times for my family with no complaints, though the beef does make it much tastier.
Hello! Here's the last of my quick and easy Valentine's Day cards that I whipped up last weekend. For this set I also kept the design simple and also used up some really old papers from my basket full of slabs (circa 2000!).
Free from duty.
Those goals aren’t necessarily by design, says Knuble.
grated Parmesan, for garnish
These two changes are not big, and they add a slightly nutty flavor to the muffin, making it resemble the light taste of the banana muffin. You can even add walnuts to play up the nutty character.
Smartass that I am, I'd entered the exhibition primed to make derogatory remarks; instead, I found myself thinking that it wouldn't be a half-bad export: a bit of high-brow consciousness raising for Masters of the Universe everywhere.
13 Drive In Saturday
A few months later, our school newspaper mentor, Patty Shillington, hired me as a high school intern for our big local daily newspaper, The Miami Herald. My photo ran with each column called "Friends and Neighbors,'' which focused on unsung heroes in our community. Suddenly I found myself writing all the time, for the school newspaper and for the real world one. I was a writer, a journalist.
The first time I ever had Indian food was in med school (which is also the time I learned to love Chinese food - the staples of students are pizza and Chinese food). A bunch of us went to a Kosher Vegetarian Indian restaurant. I don't remember what I ate...or tasted and then refused to finish...but I do remember hating it. It wasn't until I was working in Tribeca that I came to love Indian food. My co-workers and I often went for lunch at a local favorite which served the most incredible all-you-can-eat lunch buffet. I may not have always known what I was eating but it was always delicious. When I became Vegan, the options at that restaurant severely decreased for me but my co-workers were happy to try some of the many wonderful Vegan eateries in the city.
He got home....I was asleep.
My co-hosts, Rory O'Halloran from Stephen Benet's wonderful short story "The Luck of the Irish" and Carmilla, who probably is the first literary lesbian Vampire, will also be here. She and Rory have their issues so we will see what happens.
But, I couldn't stop thinking about it. Once I get an idea in my head, I have to try it or it drives me crazy. We have a small candy and cake supply store in the area, so I gave them a call. They not only had the spray, but they sold it for less than Michael's did. I have never been to that supply store before, but it's been there for years and I've always wanted to check it out. Oh My.....Was I in absolute HEAVEN!!! Anything you could possibly need to make cupcakes, cookies or cakes they had. We're talking an entire wall of cookie cutters - I could spend hours starring at them.....And I probably would have if I didn't have Nathan with me. I have a feeling that the woman who owns the store and I will be on a first name basis very, very soon....hahaha.
The past six months has robbed me of my effectiveness in my advocacy for people who are LGBT. I’ve had to suspend meetings of a supportive group at my church, and I had to cancel the presentation I was to make at a national convention of church educators. It has been truly disheartening to let these go, at least for now. But I don’t have to wait to start thinking about writing a book about Christian acceptance and support for LGBT people. I can work on that in my free time, some of which is coming up after surgery.
Another mother came in with her 17-year-old daughter, 12 year old daughter, and 7 year old son. Mom reported that her three children are homeschooled; however, she is a single parent and is working 2 jobs to make ends meet.
I am confident the cinema no longer receives custom, and am even more confident there are unknown squatters mulling around. I like that it's enjoyed a lick of paint rather recently;-)
Maybe I’m a freak.
Used a recipe on the back of the pack. The fish was made in baking paper in the ofen... with leek, garlic, thyme and a marinade of oil, mustard and lemon squash.
6. Picking the Kitty up and squeezing her tight and saying 'I fwucking wuv woo' through gritted teeth until she wriggles to get away.Purely because I love her so much I want to hurt her. (Again, Masons will get this). I might also have done this with my children Rachael and Hannah when they were babies, but I stopped it when they turned 18 so it's okay.
Seldom as we’ll assume that “They Should”, ” Their responsibility”….
Let’s get to the dancing shall we?
We had an amazing time in Italy, and I cannot wait to go back!
UPDATE: 16th July, 2011. The hearing on David Daly’s application (ref 2011/5766 P) began on Wednesday 13th July, 2011 in Dublin’s High Court before Mr Justice Michael Peart. David Daly, 66 is joined in the application by his daughter Joanne, and son Paul. The respondents are National Asset Loan Management Limited (NAMA), the State, the Attorney General and AIB PLC – some reporting suggests the receivers, Jim Hamilton of BDO Simpson Xavier in Ireland and Shay Bannon and Sarah Rayment of BDO in the UK, are also respondents but that doesn’t appear to be the case from the court record. The Dalys are represented by solicitors LK Shields and their lead barrister is Michael Cush SC, who you might recall was Paddy McKillen’s barrister in the recently concluded legal battle royale with NAMA. NAMA is represented by A&L Goodbody. The State and the Attorney General are represent by the Chief State Solicitor, David J O’Hagan and AIB is represented by Maples and Calder. The respondents are represented by barrister, Paul Sreenan. In the following David Daly will be used as shorthand for the applicants and NAMA as shorthand for the respondents.
Their newest outlet is located at the east of Singapore, Changi City Point!
Purchase a 4-pack of tickets for only $44 (Valid Monday-Thursday and Friday Matinees, excluding holidays) and save $4 on all weekend shows by logging onto http://www.ticketmaster.com/ and entering the coupon code: MOM.
"But, Sir. . .," I began.
We're looking forward to seeing what you make so please come and leave a link (and a message) when you're ready to share
Meanwhile her dad “Lord God” the disabled Forsaken Fundamentalist Church of Latter Day Saints preacher gives his daughter Ruby Cole two untenable choices. She must give up her baby Lila or marry Page a man her dad’s age who has two wives because Lord God received a heavenly vision. Deciding to not honor her martinet father, Ruby selects a third option when she decides to run away with Lila. Her seemingly isolated act of defiance turns into a butterfly effect on Widower Ward Costello and other people involved in aviary population and criminal activity.
Funny Bathtime quote: (while Mommy was washing A's hair)
The fifth most powerful and devastating hidden emotional sales weakness is called Becoming Emotionally Involved. Basically, when a salesperson becomes emotionally involved it indicates that the salesperson is thinking during the sales call. The “thinking” can include becoming internally nervous and upset, analyzing, becoming creative, worrying, panicking, getting excited, using “happy ears” and strategizing on the fly hoping to dazzle the prospect into becoming as excited as the salesperson is.
The Baltimore oriole is the typical oriole throughout much of the eastern. Monotypic. Length 8.7" (22 cm).
In the Six-Month, Finish-My-Novel Challenge, a powerful in-depth coaching is presented regarding the professional novelist’s attitude, and how that attitude is developed and nurtured. Much has to do with respect for the craft (i.e. respect for the games the subconscious loves to play with you).
Hedonic Calculus
One quandary for expats lucky enough to snag a Paris assignment is how best to communicate with the folks back home. When things are going great, you're not sure whether you should report on this. Doing so makes you feel like a show off. And if things are going badly, well that's not any easier. So you had a bad day. You're in Paris. And that kind of makes you feel like a spoiled brat.
And who is Merrain? She’s clearly not the Archon’s creature, at least not originally. So for whom does she work? Who sent her to the Archon, and why? Is she some sort of agent for the Bondsmagi? Does she anything at all to do with the pompous Karthani sons of bitches?
the orbits of my joints,
Morrison says, "We all want to thank Indie for a great time, and personally I want to say that I have enjoyed doing the show for so many years. It's time for all concerned to change it up, move on and explore new pastures - so big up and massive respect to all at Indie - thanks for a good time, folks. And stay tuned for further radio news-- the 'Camp Freddy Radio' show will be back after these words from our sponsors!!!"
- Serial number inside, cotton dustcover, certificate card & carebook let
Only two NGOs are working on the issue one is EMPOWER PEOPLE and the other is Shakti-vahini. But Shakti-vahini is working on some other issues as well, since bride trafficking is not an issue which could raise funds and, of course, no one can sustain without funds.
Now Pries is a young up and coming rapper I have been on for a few years now out of Denver. He has a B.o.B style of hip hop, which is very pop, radio friendly music. Normally I don’t like this style, but Pries can pull it off well. He still keeps some real hip hop feeling to his songs, like this one, but also goes all out pop on others. Make sure you get on this guy now so you can ride his blow up into the music industry.
of which no drainage 48.9%
“Surely,” he continued, “the State Police can find alternate means of processing firearms transactions and permit applications while the upgrade is in progress.”
Every channel you turn to, another lunatic preaches
Who is buying PORN these days?
We now know, following last Tuesday’s BBC This World documentary, that Smyth continued to abuse another boy, who was on the list supplied by Boland to the priests, until 1976, that boy’s sister until 1982 and four cousins of theirs, members of one family in Belfast, until 1988.
I am thankful for...Blessings and more blessings.It is wonderful to sit and reflect on how God has blessed me in abundance.He has been ever faithful.
Original Air Date: Feb 27, 2012
This is my reaction to hearing the news of the conviction of Stephen Lawrence's killers. I am very pleased that murderers have been brought to justice, but though there are similarities in that Gavin was killed in a vile unprovoked racist attack and his case has been closed, the obvious difference lies in the fact that Gavin was a white man. Just like in all those grooming cases where no one in official positions wants to know if the victim is white and the perpetrators not. Can the white section of the community in Oldham now look forward to immense interest and unlimited resources pouring in? I rather doubt it. The parents of Charlene Downes and others should not raise there hopes either.
I promise you'll always be the most important thing in my life.
the recipe for the pork with leeks is from my mother and i stumbled upon the recipe for leeks and beets here and i knew it will be good.
What happened to the nicities
::: the ‘welcome’ signs posted on our porch, a fresh wreath, a beautiful banner in our living room, homemade cookies and delicious oranges all waiting for us when we arrived at home from our 4 month adventure, just a day before solstice. Thank you dear friends.
There are four major aspects of the process of communication: The message, the encoding, the transmission, and the decoding. Ideally, the message is exactly the same after decoding as it is when it was encoded. but we can easily see from the message above that this is not the case.
The property is not very big. With just three bedrooms and two bathrooms it is just right for a small family, although there is the top floor to be renovated where more rooms could be created.
LOVE! To see even more information on this wonder product and see a jaw dropping price chart, check out Toni's post here.
Taz asked him why he thought Joe did it, Crimson said he took care of Joe at Slammiversary, and it could be jealousy, but he just made this personal, and will be back.
Maybe it is a sign of the times, but this week the borders between publishers offering author-publishing services blurred a little more. Apex Publishing is showing real intent on dramatically increasing its output of traditionally contracted authors with news of another autobiography of journalist and TV presenter, Garry Bushell. This follows the announcement last week of David Van Day’s autobiography and six other signed contracts, including Charles Bronson and Chas Hodges of Chas and Dave musical fame.
Matthew the Jolly was next to make a remark. “You will be raised up, make no mistake, but you shall rise by our hand and not by your weak God. We are the powerful on earth, we have killed your God, and we will kill you.”
This weekend, I had originally planned on running a local 7K (The Runnin' O' The Green). I ran it last year - even though it ended in snow and Joe was in bed, warm and cuddly. But this year? I didn't sign up; I just cuddled.
...I want to have Jane Birkin's sense of style, embody the undeniably tomboyish, yet super sassy 70's vibe and master the French-y fringe down to the T. Once I read that we all can wear a simple tee and jeans but only a few can really rock the look or even pull off carrying a wicker basket instead of a bag. J'adore! The best part: her style is so timeless and effortless, just looking at those photos makes me think that they could've been taken yesterday.
What an honor. I’ve never been great with the full stops or commas. Let’s see how far we can take this.
Pinky - back of a pencil!
That King spent uncounted hours of research on this project is obvious. I was actually in the sixties while I read this book, and Jake's nostalgic account of a long-ago era actually makes me want to go there myself to get root beer from a soda fountain and drink cold milk from a glass bottle.
Russian River Brewing Company Blind Pig IPA
Hubby: You can't just answer "Five" for every question! That's not happy, that's delusional.
Last week, I had my longest vacation from work in some time. I scheduled eleven full days, from Christmas Eve until Jan. 4, with basically nothing to do except recharge my batteries.
I have emailed each of the AHS students the April calendar of events. Please remove all the events you will not be participating in, leaving only those activities in which you involved, and email it back to me with your name included as part of the actual MS Word filename.
so do everything in your power now ..to do things right
*I'm loving that I get to leave for South Dakota this Saturday. I get to see my niece and my nephew AND my newest nephew who is on his way within the week!
My snake phobia, which has been ever-present in my life, has gotten markedly worse. The hills of Northern California are known for being prime rattlesnake territory and several friends who enjoy hiking have alerted me that the rattlers are definitely out and about already this spring. In fact, most of my hiker friends have seen at least one if not two snakes per hike during the last month. I have been strongly advised to stay off trails until the weather gets cooler, something I'm more than happy to do (although I'll miss running at Tilden).
tongs
I had forgotten to bring reading material and ended up scrounging through their bookcase. Yes, this calm and peaceful place was perfect for catching up on some reading. I ended up finding an awesome little book entitled A Gathering of Old Men. A story set around the 60's or 70's, but looking back in the early part of the last century... about racial tensions, slavery and ignorance, and men who had been too frightened to stand up, lest they be silenced forever... and then, when they were old and didn't care any longer, wanting to make sense of their wasted lives, they decide to stand up...set in a Louisiana backdrop. Quite the book to read, surrounded by such earthly materialistic pleasures. Makes one thankful, indeed, for so many things.
The two little guys had fun running around together, playing with Riley(the lab), jumping on the bed and playing on the swing set! They got along so well:) Great grandma and grandpa Sparks even came up for dinner one night too.
So if you are truly our leader, why did you not come down and speak to the Rakyat ? Is that not “1Malaysia – Rakyat didahulukan , pencapaian diutamakan”
Sad news the death of Davy Jones, the pocket sized pop star and tambourine banger in *the* Best Boy Band - ever. I can't better John Robb's piece - so I'll remember him with a repost...
This blog accepts forms of cash advertising, sponsorship, paid insertions or other forms of compensation.
However, two questions should be asked of the “it’s too soon” criticism:
- Work cannot be hung on an angle, so plan your work to be level. (If the pieces do not meet the dimensional
Pains of the past
Here are the rest of the ATC's I traded for:
Ugh. I felt so sick. I still can not believe this. I am desperately hoping (we are calling our insurance company back today) that it is at least the modified 700 number, the 1,290 number I can't even wrap my head around.
But thanks to Egypt’s revolution, that comfortable assumption has proven false. If large-scale rocket fire on southern Israel resumes and another war in Gaza becomes necessary, Israel will now pay a far higher price, both militarily and diplomatically, than it would have in 2008.
A court heard the brothers subjected taxi driver Mr Wang and his family to a ‘harrowing and brutal attack’ lasting 15 minutes.
It makes me feel calm
It began mundane enough. A man named similarly as the world’s Harry Potter-figure turned out to be more similar to that character in more ways than one. Soon enough he was journeying through various stories, myths, and tropes as he undertook one quest after another. First he sought his father, the man who created him, and eventually he ran after the source of the magical strangeness that has suddenly befallen his life.
Sweet malty smell to it, which should make it a German. It has the right hops hit to it as well.
It's a Toyota truck that has been lowered to literally 6 inches off the ground or less, painted white all over, including the bed cover.
BBQ’ing adds a flavor you just can’t be replicated in an oven or on a counter top grill. Not to mention the calories saved by BBQ’ing. The range of items you can BBQ goes beyond the hamburger, your only limited by your imagination. BBQ til your hearts content.
My initial thoughts:
Keep in mind that the last time I woke up to drive at 6 am ( a whole other ball game from 5 am ) I’d done so to drive during my road test which I failed while imparting a new meaning to the word abysmal … and that was in Muscat .
"I've been trying to get my kids involved in community service, but there aren't a lot of opportunities for them. Then he asked if he could clean up this area," she said.
I’ve completely slept on these beauties for quite sometime now and regret it! I thought I could make due and be satisfied with a similar pair that I had picked up from Topman last year, but the more I compare the boot I have, to this Wolverine Boot, I find myself fiending for the Wolverine Boot. Dont get me wrong, I love my Topman Boot, but need this Wolverine Boot as well. Oh the problems of a shoe/boot fiend. HA!
Droṇa is a great martial artist, who was the instructor of the entire royal family. His son is Aśvatthāmā, who beheaded the five sleeping children of “Kṛṣṇā.” The master of Droṇa’s son is Duryodhana, because he was the leader under whose cursed banner Droṇa and his son fought.
Where did my passion,
being in a VERY unpleasant mood, I called my doula and informed her I was going to the hospital. She chatted with me for awhile and then kindly suggested I stay home, as I could talk through contractions just fine. She knew I was afraid that if I got there early, I might get be more likely to get an epidural. And I agreed. I think it would have been better to labor at home. BUT, there was no way I was going to do so peacefully, so I decided to go. I knew she had a meeting that night, so I told
are in better shape today than 50 years ago?
Pakistan Today
New Free Porn Movies Added Each Day: Teenagers, asian, amateur, large boobs, ass, milf, blowjob, latina, bbw, public etc.
3) It looks like the U.S. hardcover version of Daughter of the Flames has gone or is going out of print (no one's informed me of this officially, but the publisher's website no longer lists it and it's not available to buy new anywhere anymore). Frankly, this is one of the most beautiful hardcovers I've ever seen, with copper foiling on the bindings to match the flaming phoenixes on the dustcover, so if anyone else is a book junkie and likes to collect them for their beauty - now is the time to snap up a copy.
Rachel turned to me and said "I bet you let your kids do it. Am I right"?
Pick One Band: Kimbra.
For companies, the corporate driving package includes driver assessment, private driving instruction, a driving safety course, a defensive driving course, and custom corporate training programs.
Deliverance comes when you worship God in the midst of your
Thanks for stopping by daily.
Belly
Tis the season! There are many children’s books that I love to read this time of year. Books such as The Polar Express and How the Grinch Stole Christmas are stories that I could hear again and again, each time with the same thrill and anticipation I had as a child. However, December is a month of multicultural holiday celebrations. As a mother of two and a preschool teacher I try to find books that will teach about the many different holidays and festivities around the world. I don’t believe we can appreciate the true spirit of the season until we can understand the meaning of celebrations from cultures that are different from our own. The following list is a mere sample of the great literature available, I hope you enjoy.
Northern police forces have investigated gangs of on-street predators for at least 14 years. In the most serious cases, children have been moved around the country in cars and used for sex by older men. This has led to abortions for girls as young as 12. In November, a court heard that when a South Yorkshire victim, aged 13, was examined by a nurse she appeared to have been raped more than 50 times.
But it did make me start thinking about trading up my old clodhoppers and possibly going to see a professional about my leg pain.
It's making a list of goals for the upcoming year instead of resolutions. I used to make resolutions but I could never quite stick with any of them. After I read Kerri's take on this, I figured I could certainly try this. In her words, this is what it is.
To Ethelred the head tow.”
Since in chapter 4, McKnight examined Paul’s concept of the gospel, he presents a question here in chapter 5. How did we get to a Christian culture that now promotes salvation over the fuller biblical expression of the gospel?
FB: Why?
The exciting part for me, I get to see another newborn before the week is over! Christina
Admittedly, my life has been fairly hectic and sleep has taken a priority over exercise and meal planning. How long can I keep using this excuse though? Not much longer. I haven’t taken the necessary actions yet but I have finally reached the point where I can acknowledge that something’s got to go. I must prioritise my health or I won’t be around to do all the ‘stuff’ I want to do. I won’t get far down my bucket list. My wake up call came when I saw this picture posted in a ‘motivation’ thread in a 12wbt forum.
Why? I thought that I lucked out when I got a Motorola Cliq XT Android phone for free. I mean "wow". My little Blackberry was still holding on and I was going to wait until early next year to do an upgrade. Yet, I was envying my Android and iPhone carrying friends to some degree.
Jen (the recipient of the shower) had said to me early on that if I was going to throw a shower she’d like me to know that her favorite cake was from Lamb’s Thriftway and was the banana cake with bavarian cream filling.
Again, you might say it’s hardly surprising in a post-devolution UK, with nationalist politics influential in Cardiff and dominating governments in Edinburgh and Belfast, that Britishness is being eroded. The extent of that decline, though, should be a major cause for worry.
As I’ve already pointed out, my first instinct was to get pissed off. Then, very quickly came the impulse to fan out and scoop up as much Cinder Cone Red (let’s call it CCR) as I could and hoard it. (Ironically, that was my first impulse when I first discovered CCR and learned it was a seasonal. I kept 12 of them stashed in the back of the closet for more than a month!) Now, in my zeal, I immediately sought out the local distributor, the local Total Wine outlet and Deschutes themselves. I neglected to bother with much detailed research on line at places like Beer Advocate; an oversight that would eventually prove significant.
Here is Hillbilly Moon Explosion with my new favourite version of Chick Habit:
Position yourself as before : on your back, knees bent, with feet flat on the floor. In this exercise I recommend that you consciously shorten your inhalations and exhalations. (Your breath rate should not become rapid, though; the shorter inhalations and exhalations are balanced by the longer extended pause.) Inhale for one or two to four seconds, and then pause. During the pause should be like the natural relaxation that occurs as you exhale. You can extend the pause by consciously relaxing wherever you feel specific tensions.
You must go visit her Blog, you'll fall in love, and don't forget to check out my little feature!!!
We finally decided on clear plexiglass as the covering.
State: Just put the baby in the crib, watching some Colbert to let the DVR of the World Extreme Cagefighting get recorded a little bit so I can fast forward the commercials.
Only one of the best brunches I have ever had, in fact as I write this I cannot even think of a better one. It is the perfect way to start your weekend, the food is just so incredibly good. Do not miss the Baked Clifford Farms Eggs with Tomato & Chorizo, The Best Biscuit You’ve Ever Had with Butter & Jam (it really is the best I have ever had, they speak the truth.) And their House Blend Coco, it is perfect hot chocolate, not to sweet and made with great chocolate.
card stock: Moonlit Fog Pure Luxury, purple textured is Bazzill Basics called Grape Jelly, white
The new buzzword is “He-covery”. That’s the term the New York Times’ Catherine Rampell and others use to characterize the new numbers on our so-called economic recovery. Cute the way we use gender terms to nickname serious issues, isn’t it?
A pair of similarly dressed people, a man and a woman, both with blonde hair and similar features, run at her with their fists raised. Without thinking, she whirls about swiftly and slams her fist into one and then the other, sending both of them falling to the floor. The man rises first and charges at her again, but she merely stands until he is within reach, and then reaches out faster than she can blink to wrap her hand around his throat. At first she squeezes, and feels him gasping and clawing at her hand for air. Then she feels the familiar milky flow through her palms and fingertips, this time cool and smooth. She sees a silvery white liquid seeping down his throat, and his thrashing slowly ceases. The woman suddenly lunges at him to knock him from Djoran’s grasp, but she catches the woman’s arm and whirls her back, reaching out and clutching her throat as well. Soon two sets of eyes have rolled gently up into their heads, bodies gone slack and faces smooth and relaxed.
I know some people will work through their collections listening systematically, but I think I'll create some new playlists and maybe edit away some of the songs too.
The Agenda of The Write Agenda: In which Writer Beware exposes the smear campaign being waged against anti-scam activists by an anonymous group calling itself "The Write Agenda," and considers whether some familiar faces may actually be behind it.
Beefsteak, Brandywine, Yellow Pear and Speckled Roman
The lucky winner will not only receive a $5,000 yard makeover, but they will also receive a visit from Taniya Nayak (@TaniyaNayak on Twitter). Taniya will go through and give you tips on the best way to update your yard! She will give you creative ideas for incorporating flower bulbs into your landscape.
I colored all my images with my Copic Markers and just had so much fun making these cards.
WIE: Could you describe that breakthrough?
Tata Institute of Social Sciences
Would Elli miss her shot at love?
I have loved anchovies ever since my grandfather introduced me to them when I was 6 years old. My long love affair began when he opened up a tin of anchovy rolled capers; I couldn't get enough of them.
I have this awesome and highly little entertaining pattern that I live: Just when my life is starting to feel good, peaceful, full of love and stuff that smells curiously like joy, I create a killer drama to get me all jaded. Now, because I have become a mini Buddha rock, this can no longer be a mini drama. It has to be a big Kahuna to throw me off my rock of Godly peace. So, just when I was starting to feel that maybe life was actually a lovely peaceful thing for me to deliciously inhale one sweet, gentle day at a time, with love pouring out of it tirelessly, I created some weird arsed Peruvian bug mystery to throw Agatha Christie and created a pseudo housing ‘crisis’.
To start off, I sprayed my heart shrine pieces with silver spray paint. I've talked about treating the Masonite before. You can read about it here. I wanted a metallic base and spray paint is fast. Here are my pieces all painted:
Exhausting, yet lovely.
The Gavotte remains popular in Brittany to this day and you will often see it demonstrated during the many wonderful festivals held throughout Brittany during the summer months.
John dimly recalled Nicola going on about this new neighbour over the weekend, but couldn’t recall the specifics, he hadn’t been paying attention. It wasn’t like Nicola to want to mix with the neighbours and he was curious. He made a mental note to ask Nicola about this when she got back before getting stuck into the paperwork Jeremy gave him. It was going to be a long, and unpleasant evening.
That’s it……ask questions…and a lot of them!
They exemplify the art of the corporate tease. Microsoft approaches a company on the verge of being washed away into the ebb of Internet history, and offers them the vital flow of capital they crave. No full merger, just a friendly alliance with mutual benefits.
I haven't read the book in a while. Reading it to her this afternoon I was so impressed with Mr. Slinger. Why he struck me so today I am not sure. Possibly when I read the book previously I was a more patient, understanding teacher than I am at the moment.
Eeee I'm off to Barcelona in a few days!.. Eeeeeeee!
Those of you who are still paying attention will realize that the past tense has been used throughout this blog. And, so we come to the irony, at last! Six weeks before George Osborn, the UK’s Chancellor of the Exchequer, mentioned TIF in his 2012 Budget Statement, the model was abolished in the State of California! Two thousand and eleven was a year of claims and counter claims over the value-added of redevelopment agencies, debates that were often played out in both the law courts and in the media. It got ugly – ‘toxic’ according to some – and ended up in the California Supreme Court on 29 December. This ruled that AB27 – which would have meant the redevelopment agencies handing over large amounts of their reserves to the State – was illegal. The Court basically reinforced Proposition 22. So far so good for redevelopment agencies, and the California Redevelopment Association that represented them. However, the Supreme Court upheld AB26 – which meant that as the State had created redevelopment agencies and TIF, through the 1945 Act and its 1952 addition, it could also end them. Redevelopment agencies would be dissolved. Panic in the California redevelopment community set in. Attempts were made to build bridges with the Governor’s office and the State legislator, but to no avail. TIF, and the 400 plus redevelopment agencies that used the model to fund a range of projects around the State, ceased to exist on 1 February 2012. The result remains an absolute mess. One sort of bureaucracy is being replaced with another. Successor agencies around California are trying to manage the winding down of a highly complex and locally specific ‘model’. Meanwhile, at the State level, Jerry Brown is pulling in staff from different department to oversee the processes through which it gets to give the okay to some TIF projects to continue and to end others. Watch out for wave after wave of court cases, as all involved seek to establish landmark rulings.
Happy St. Patricks Day!
I spent time with Emma and Tessa, I took Tanner for a long walk. I finally, FINALLY, finished this project and so far, I am very happy with how it turned out....
2 oz of softened butter
Proceeds from THAT’S VOICEOVER! benefit the Alzheimer’s Association.
The fastest way for you to get curly updos, you can come to the salon. They will provide some tools that will make your hair style curly updos. Most of the salon for updo hairstyles make it easy……[read more]
I have been clean,clean, CLEANING since Monday and have not stopped (Well except maybe yesterday when I spent the day getting all my necessities at Walmart...if only we had a Target here! I have reorganized my desk 5 times, made my dog homemade treats, planned out mine and Clayton's meals through next meal, grocery shopping, toiletry shopping, school supply shopping, organized my closest, laminated my little heart away, among many other things... whew! I sure do like to keep busy! What I loved the most was school supply shopping. It literally takes me multiple trips to the planner aisle before I can make a final decision and the same goes for notebooks, pens, EVERYTHING! I can't even imagine what I am going to be like when it comes to decorating my classroom!
the more I realize Christmas is a matter of the heart......
Wishing all our wonderful readers and subscribers a happy, healthy, and peaceful holiday season--whatever kind of holidays you celebrate. See you in 2012!
~Whatever else you want to add~
Spellbinders Hearts, Scalloped Hearts, Round and Scalloped Round dies were used for this project. An unknown satin white ribbon ties this design together!
Ironically, Tam got a six year prison sentence for making money; but top bankers now get bonuses for losing money; and, with ‘quantitive easing’, the Bank of England is now in the business of printing funny money.
The chalet was organised and booked by my 4th SIL By 6 pm most of the other family members had come and the bbq started.
But this novel is no bleeding heart criticism of social conditions. Whatever your views about young people who kick against society, you have to admit that the dominant problem in Stephen's life is a real one. It's twelve foot long and he's been feeding it a pig a month.
Sport team, 3 season participation, novice level (much less practice than the Varsity team)
When he tried coming back into the restaurant a couple of weeks later, we had to politely remind him that we reserve the right to refuse service to anyone. Especially people who publicly skip out on their tab whenever their girlfriends storm out of the restaurant during a fight.
My intention was to complete the loop and go all the way from the bridge-side of trail to the causeway/traffic circle end and back to the bridge. However, due to the fact that I only began the trek at almost 19:30, I didn’t make it all the way to the causeway as the sun was beginning its descent to the horizon and daylight would start to fade soon afterwards, so the decision was made to turn around when I was approximately 3.2km in. The other downside is that the trail is unlit and tricky in some spots, a great combo for stumbling and tripping in the dark.
9/9 Networking
(images courtesy of Flickr)
One of the common objections to the Christian view of salvation, especially in its Reformed expression, is that salvation by grace alone through faith alone leads to moral license. If we can’t earn one tiny iota of deliverance from sin by our good works, then why do good at all?
On Sunday, though, we got a ton of rain on top of all the snow we've had. Since our basement tends to flood whenever there's a chance of a lot of rain we now do a once-over of the basement and move anything important off the floor. On Sunday this meant taking my bike off the trainer and putting both it and the trainer up off the floor. Thankfully the basement didn't flood.
Last year, police launched a pre-emptive strike, arresting those selling Bersih T-shirts as well as Parti Sosialis Malaysia members who were dubbed the “heroic EO6”. On July 9, special “arrest squads” moved in and police were filmed using excessive force against those hauled up. One policeman even admitted to FMT after that it was wrong to beat and kick protesters.
I know I've been a blog slacker on this blog. What can I say? I only have time to write this right now because I'm in a hotel room with nothing else to do. I coach my son's high school aged FTC Robotics team and we're going to the State championships tomorrow. So I have a few minutes to post. But the last few months have been total chaos.
Today's card is heading over to the following challenges:
and camp under stars
And the way I think about it is the campaigns are outsourcing the trouble of raising money to well-connected individuals. And sort of the reform question is, is that a problem because the one person can still only give that $2,300. But if they can drop off a pile of checks that is a million dollars, have they in essence evaded the spirit of the law?
I am hoping to let you guys (I am imagining that there will be some of you at some point) get to know me a little. I am hoping that my personal trials and journeys can offer some inspiration to help others overcome their own obstacles. I think this will be a cathartic process for me too, sharing my thoughts and daily updates online is daunting and exciting.
Judged by its cover: The pretty skinny white girl in a pretty dress that has nothing to do with the story sets me to twitching, but of that school of cover design, this one actually isn't bad. I like the smoke effect, and the pomegranate color scheme very much puts me in mind of a Persephone story, which is, of course, what this is.
1/2 c grated Parmigiano Regianno cheese
Last night I was telling Ross, "sometimes it just seems so selfish. This life that he is wasting."
But public subsidies would support the housing, and those subsidies could be used to build housing elsewhere.
The Case For “The Case For . . .” Books – Funny satire mocking Christian apologist Lee Strobel and his infinite number of books he’s written with titles beginning with “The Case For . .. “
And acceptance is the answer to all my problems today. When I am disturbed, it is because I find some person, place, thing or situation — some fact of my life — unacceptable to me, and I can find no serenity until I accept that person, place, thing or situation as being exactly the way it is supposed to be at this moment. Nothing, absolutely nothing happens in God’s world by mistake.
hard at work on "Tota Pulchra Es," I believe.
This is a new kind of illustration for me. I usually paint pictures that can be understood without text. But if someone views this illustration with out the text, I am sure they will be quite puzzled by the elephant falling from the snowy sky. Hopefully the "Magic Show" poster will help explain it!
I can’t seem to move.
1 Green Pepper, chopped – optional
Kitchen- empty dishwasher before breakfast and clear the table and load the dishes after dinner.
I considered my options. Carefully, I rolled the newspaper carpet towards the door. The poo lake rolled towards me in a wave. I decided that rolling was a bad idea. After some thought, I used most of my newspaper supply to soak up as much of the catastrophe as possible, pushed the whole lot in to a bin liner and then threw buckets of water and disinfectant in to the coop until my nostril hairs stopped burning. Those seven strawberries cost me an hour of hard, stinky labour. The girls watched me from the border, where they considerately jumped up occasionally to chew on my roses.
and are thrilled that you spend time with us!
“Oh….I didn’t did I?” Laughing, Bob shook his head. He thought Emily was a little bossy, seeming to want things always to go her way. Running his hand through his balding hair, Bob walked back over to the fridge and got out some chocolate syrup, squirting it in Emily’s cup. “How’s that?”
In loving service,
And you will get THREE!
Article 118
but along with the snow that came early that monday morning came something else...
5. Bump up heat. Deglaze skillet with Armagnac, scraping diligently to incorporate all the tasty browned bits stuck to pan. Once reduced to a syrup, scrape into a small bowl. Set aside to cool.
She asked me if it was switched on at the power point.
Confused? Well, the book has very little conflict other than people wanting what they can't have, so after a while, I was confused too. Wynne is new to the BDSM scene, and it seems her submissiveness turns all three of these guys on. The problem is that none of the sex is very erotic, and the rest of the story is just a bit flat. And although the book gives a warning that this is a "sexually explicit" book, I found it a bit tame.
We're good people! Richard and I try our hardest to make the best decisions that will allow us to sleep good at night. We give everything we do our all so that at the end of the day we know that we won't have any regrets because we tried our best.
So, I know I don’t want a conservative or an even-more-conservative to win. So I am left with the left. Alberta Party is out of the question. I know too little about them, and they have virtually no chance of making any impact, even in a minority government situation. I am left with the NDP or the Liberals. So, who should I vote for?
On Monday morning we went on stubhub and found a great deal on a pair of tickets. This was of course my first Dolphins game, and it was clearly a great game to go to. It was the first Monday Night Football game of the year and so to start off the game there was a pretty cool flyover by a stealth bomber.
It can be an article from a publication, a website, a PR release, an ad, a video clip -- any piece of communication about advertising or marketing -- just as long as it's bullshit.
Now as a photographer, hhhmmmm, often when you want THE shot, you sometimes (OFTEN?) have to take risks?
2) When you're on a screen that has a list you can scroll through vertically, the left silver buttons scroll through the list one item at a time.
Origin: Diminutive of Scottish Douglas
I tried in the fall to keep up with my calories on the Spark People app (which was really great if one is going to keep up with calories) and I would be all into it for a few weeks but then it was just old. boring. the same thing. And I still wasn’t losing weight. So, I lost motivation and that was all she wrote! I continued to use the app but only as a weight tracker.
Earlier in the day, designer Eina Ahluwalia’s accessory presentation looked forced and a pain in the neck for the models who wore them on the runway. Designer Payal Singhal’s offering also leaned more towards jarring than aesthetic when she attempted heavy ornamentation. However, designer Nupur Kanoi made a stylish presentation using long tapes of fabrics in a mesh format to treat the surfaces of her creations. Young Ruchika Sachdeva played well with silhouettes and surfaces. Designer Swapnil Shinde made another space-age presentation — something that he is known for by now.
Yes, all the profits from the sale of the JUST BREATHE trilogy will go to programs that educate people about whales. I don’t need the money. Whales do.
I hope my 30′s will enlighten me more and give me more wisdom and strength to get through these new situations that will arise so that I don’t have to look back and think what if...?
“When the government’s boot is on your throat, whether it is a left boot or a right boot, a male boot or female boot, a black boot or white boot, a Catholic, Muslim, Christian or Atheist boot, a straight, homosexual or lesbian boot; is of no consequence.”
Yesterday, a coworker informed us that she's just been diagnosed with bone cancer. She start chemo next week, so I thought a shawl would be a nice way to keep her warm and let her know we are all thinking of her as she fights her battle.
Try to wrap your head around these numbers -- on a monthly basis, Shaq spends:
The Life & Times today are Tough
Afterwards we met up with friends for dessert which also helped cool our burning mouths. I had mango doufuhua again. This was my fave of the two, it has a better mango to tofu ratio and was slightly tangy as well as sweet.
Powers: Morphing metal arm, super strength, super speed, stamina.
soldiers can be heard in the distance.
We've been enjoying our long summer break! Here's a peek at what we've been up to over the extended Christmas break we have here in NZ:
Christi is a member of the Paducah Fiber Artists. Her quilts often make reference to Chinese or Native American medicine.
He was in reality torn between the opposing forces of delight and envy; delight in a new discovery, even though he himself had had no part in it, and envy of the discoverer upon whom Fortune had smiled.
I hope your all having a much nice bank holiday weekend, weatherwise, than we are. It has been raining on and off all weekend so far, typical bank holiday weekend!
Dress ("Emma", Smoking Lily), jacket (Pelican Cove, consignment), shoes (Prepare Guides, Fluevog), bug pendant (Heart's Content), wrist wrap (Shi Studio), ring (Wendy Brandes).
The other night I ran across a new-to-me group called Rend Collective Experiment. I'm totally loving it, lots of good lyrics that actually glorify Christ. Sadly, even in so-called Christian music this is a rarity!
UPDATE: Jessops are now displaying the lenses in stock:
Let's see... I can also talk about our downstairs neighbor because she doesn't know about the blog. She's renting the studio apartment in the basement of our Tiny Cottage and we met for the first time over the weekend.
The remnants of purity, and innocents of vision seems to be vanishing. Things are not what they are anymore. A is not A, just opposite of what Aristotle's Law of Idenity supposed.
Bâri′’s stay at Sukarno’s Presidential Palace didn’t last forever. In fact, his Indonesian stay may have lasted only four years – just as “The Obama Narrative” wants us to believe.
Would like voters to believe jobs are lost to overregulation even when surveys show that less than 1% of employers claim to have reduced jobs as a result of regulatory effects. YES
Neville Bartos: Forget about it. All right?
“Great dancers are not great because of their technique,
No blogs for the last couple of days, and for that I apologize. I’ve been dealing with a minor crisis on the home front involving hospitals and the like. Everything is fine now (by the grace of God).
It feels like I haven't been here for ages, but the last post was only three days ago. I think it's because I'd prepared SP's birthday Square of Lust before hand and haven't spent much time in blogville since the end of January when I prepared & posted the Star Trek items. That Bananarama video was neither here nor there, so that doesn't count, either.
Tournament Director Matt Meade, who coaches the 14-under Lake Erie Waves, is pleased to see how the event has grown since its inception. He said the inclusion of more out-of-state teams has upped the competition, benefiting everyone involved.
Now, I don’t know if you have noticed or not but I have an issue with conformity – doing things the way others do them. I am not saying it is wrong to do what others do, I just think its wrong to do what others want you to do if it is not what you want to do. Did you know that people make others conform all the time? In an experiment by Solomon Asch, people were seated together and told they were to test their own eye sight by choosing lines that were the closest in length. Everyone that was seated in the group, except one person, was in on the experiment and had scripted answers. After the first couple questions, they purposely all told the same wrong answer. The one person who was not in on the experiment most often would change his opinion to fit that of the others.
not wasting my waist me ;)
Growers differed in their views on whether or not it was more finely flavoured than Farnham or Canterbury Whitebines.
Rumors of my death have been greatly exaggerated! I'm not dead, and I haven't been very stampy this week, either. Why? Well, it's certainly not for lack of supplies! Nope! I'm taking the online class by Tim Holtz called Creative Chemistry 101, wherein he's trying to teach us all how to use the Ranger products most of us already have. It's actually quite embarrassing.
1. Everything happens just as it should so don’t worry when things don’t go your way.
Debra Magpie Earling
First, step back for a minute or so and imagine having
“The EPA and Corps actually want to control all waters of the United States and all activities affecting those waters. You do not want the EPA and Corps in your backyard,” said Chuck Cushman of American Land Rights Association.
I know it’s stupid.
And then there were the towering piano players: Pete Johnson, Albert Ammons, Meade Lux Lewis, Roosevelt Sykes, Leroy Carr, Jelly Roll Morton, Champion Jack Dupree, Tuts Washington, Willie “The Lion” Smith, Otis Spann, Memphis Slim, Pinetop Perkins, Professor Longhair, James Booker, Allen Toussaint and Dr John.
At around 20 feet off the ground it’s my highest I’ve ever jumped on. But hey it’s only a sneek preview. I’ll jump 30 feet on Ariel’s Point on the mainland. Then 50 feet off the cliffs of Malapascua in Cebu. This kid likes to die hard. And my reward for that act of bravery (and foolishness) is a painful dose of sun burns. Don’t ever touch my back kiddos (it hurts).
Lesson #2: If your sample could be the beginning of any story ever, it's not The Best Thing.
Yes, we've slipped back to C after only a brief foray into D-land. Sorry.
I love you, Tommy, I love you, Tommy
The apostles came to recognise that Jesus was the Messiah sent to redeem His people, but also that Jesus was none other than the eternal Son of God who had come to live in the world He had made, and to die for the sins of His people.
Erica Smolders – I was attending University overseas, took a part-time job at a small flower stand and fell in love with it. Within weeks I’d decided that I just had to be a floral designer... and the rest is history.
Tips For Using a Firm Body Shaper
Today I looked back on my life so far, and I realized that I’ve never felt quite at home here. Lately this feeling of being misplaced has grown in me, misplaced but perhaps not placed haphazardly.
*Next, select 15 blogs/bloggers that you’ve recently discovered or follow regularly.
- higher categories which need Work to fulfil, but they pay better and better.
Mason’s nine and he’s pretty mature for his age. He tells me a lot of kids say a lot of nasty things on the bus, but he doesn’t resort to their level of thinking and stands up for himself and his buddies. That’s what we taught him. Still, I wonder just how many THINGS he is learning on his bus ride home from school.
If I can't have an antique grandfather or mantel clock, I could have the soundtrack, right?
His false claim that the human race descended from him has been thoroughly refuted by science.
She will be held captive
After a small glitch where our Transportation Specialist forgot to pick me up and left me standing on the corner of Canal and Royal for an hour, I arrived at the work site only to find that my beautiful grouting job had just been torn apart. Orders from the head office, they weren’t happy with the tiles, etc and it had tobe ripped out. ouch. but as I have learned in the process of rebuilding homes and lives. One has to roll with it and not take anything personally. they would be hiring a contractor to do the job. Well, at the risk of sounding a little arrogant, I did some beautiful grouting and was glad I had taken pics; One has to have a flexible personality and not get attached to things here. It is all part of the recovery and healing. Learning to roll with the punches so to speak!
* Nancy Killefer: tax lien on home for failing to pay unemployment tax for household workers
Sneaky business.
and sidewalk awnings.
Your Sunday suit slides
Don't you just enjoy standing still sometimes and gazing out to sea?
I'm wanting to start to make more cocktails at home because, we Marshall has beer with the guys and most of the girls drink it too (I can't stand the stuff) so I want a little something for me. I think these three and then I'd have a pretty good selection for making a few different kinds.
I don’t mean their high price shoes click clanking across the floor. I mean their loud, harsh, abrasive mouth. Talking, shouting,Gossiping, demanding etc.
The floating cap of sea ice on the Artic ocean shrank this summer to what it probably its smallest size in at least a century, continuing a trend toward less summer ice and the shift is hard to explain without attributing it in part to human-caused global warming.
Favorite kind of cereal? What are your go-to snacks when studying? Do you love any “weird” food combos?
"HAND made with LOVE"
Now, for other RM news:
Post on your blog.
Amos was a layman who spoke for God… He spoke of God’s justice and mercy and love. He warned against luxuries and the sin of self-indulgence… He preached that God would punish wrongdoing… He preached repentance and a need to be restored to the Living God, in whom is true riches and prosperity. Judgment is no small thing… When it is about to fall upon a nation, it is time to stop everything and pray. Joel prophesies this in Joel 2:15-17… Isaiah prophesies that the Lord will come to Zion and bring to light every hidden thing of darkness (Isaiah 59:18-20). Also note… Malachi 3:1-3; Isaiah 4:1-3, 66:5; Jeremiah 5:22; Ezekiel 26:16-18, 32:10; Daniel 6:26; Hosea 11:10-11; and James 2:19. When God comes… people will tremble… Judgment begins at the house of God first and then continues to the rest of the nation. In Isaiah 6:1, the Seraphims cried “Holy”… God’s holiness was so bright that they covered their faces. Modern man scoffs at God’s holiness.
9:20AM
Tell me what you think.
Other things going on... I have recently branched out from the web design and have started Presh Prints. www.preshprints.com - super cute birth announcements and birthday invitations and more to come... super excited about this and this is where I spend most of my extra time.. I'm just stoked.
We took a nice weekend trip to see the Jesuit ruins in the south of Paraguay and also in Argentina. They were very interesting, I love old, crumbling bits of history, so they were perfect for me. They boys seemed to enjoy them as well.
Main image printed onto acetate with a white glitter paper behind giving an ethereal look. Embellished with organza bows, marabou feathers and faux gemstone sprays with a couple of coordinating Tim holtz vintage roses.
The Department of Industrial Policy and Promotion (DIPP) has recently posted on its website all the feedback received by it in response to its discussion paper on the 'Review of the Organizational Structure of the Controller General of Patents, Designs, Trademarks and Geographical Indication'. The Department has received feedback from a number of organizations including INTA, INTERPAT, OPPI, IPA, FICCI etc. All the responses can be accessed over here. The most interesting submissions, in my opinion, is from the 'Officials of the Delhi Patent Office'. Not only have these officials questioned the practice of outsourcing examinations to the CSIR, they have also criticized the quality of examinations conducted by the CSIR. These officials have also made some interesting recommendations on improving the internal systems of the patent office. Their submissions can be accessed over here.
We have to say thanks again to Allen and Lolita for the gift of tamales. They recommended a nearby grocery store in Cathedral City that has 'pretty good' tamales. We went there today, and it was a huge great store where I picked up some cactus leaves, tomatillo sauce, cheese and chicken tamales and jicama. Next time I hope to remember to take my wee Latino cookbook, or at least a proper list.
February 26th
D (with Mo editing from beside)
CONSERVATIVE: pasty pasty pasty. I like pasties too. Yum yum. Last pasty I had. Pasty pasty. Cynical Leader of the Oppastie photo pastie. Pasty pasty pasty pas…
Dee: I think probably the Renly death scene because of what I said above. It was precisely done the way it was in the book, so there was nothing wrong about it, but I think it was misplaced for an episode. It would’ve served a lot better to be at the end of an episode instead of at the beginning of one. The Wall stuff is also a little boring right now, although Sam’s trying to be adorable.
If it’s a crime to follow a girl all the way home
The increase in seismicity at Taal Volcano reflects a low-level episode of unrest. Alert Level 1 remains in effect over Taal Volcano. At present, no imminent eruption is indicated although the public is advised to observe some precautions. In this regard, PHIVOLCS reminds the general public that the Main Crater area is off-limits because steam explosions may suddenly occur. Other hazards within the Main Crater may be the build up of toxic gases in case of more pronounced volcanic reactivation. The northern portion of the Main Crater rim, in the vicinity of Daang Kastila Trail, may also be hazardous, when reactivated with steam emission and increased thermal activity. Furthermore, the public is reminded that Taal Volcano Island is a high-risk area and permanent danger zone, hence, habitation is strictly not recommended.
My people humble people who expect
I am wishing all of you very peaceful, thoughtful and fulfilling Holidays. It's been such a pleasure to meet you all, and I look forward to continued online "art adventures".
To participate in this week’s prompt, write an original poem using any or all of the words listed below. Post your poem on your blog (or in the comments section here, if you’d prefer), and then use the Mister Linky button (at the bottom of the post) to link back to your poem. Don’t forget to leave feedback for other contributors throughout the week, visiting their blogs as you have time.
It's hypocrisy gone mad don't you know.
He had: Godzilla Burger
It is going to only choose 10 mins every day to figure out how to prepare your brain to obtain the most out of it and discover natural talents and abilities that can make your daily life a whole lot simpler and consider it towards the following level.
Dough (B)
So while the intentions were good here, I think the execution is lacking, especially in connecting the vintage black and white work to the contemporary world. This isn't the first show in these rooms that has run off the rails as it left the 1950s. The Met needs to do a better job of connecting the dots between its vast holdings and more recent artistic activity when it takes on a broad topic like this one, or it should be happy to stay focused on its areas of traditional strength. The photography on view here is certainly of high quality, but the thematic construct is too diffuse to be very enlightening or educational.
Dear Lapsed Subscriber,
6. Do you know someone who loves the theatre? The Merrigong has season tickets, gift vouchers or tickets to individual shows. Season tickets start from $175 or perhaps tickets to the Pirates of Penzance ($62) or The School for Wifes ($49) There are plenty of family shows too including The Gruffalo's Child ($22) and the Bugalugs Bum Thief ($22)
The Town authorities tried in vain to locate any relatives in Kansas to release Mildred Packer’s body to, but could find none. The Town Judge in Red River then informed the Medical Examiners office in nearby Taos that the body was to be cremated and the ashes scattered since no relatives could be located.
On Sunday I got out the sidewalk chalk so the little baby granddaughter and I could draw on my driveway and sidewalk. I love writing on the sidewalk. We used to do that when we were kids. We would take a stone and etch a hopscotch board onto a driveway or sidewalk and play for hours. Imagine, being entertained for hours by a simple stone and a flat surface!
Often, efficiency is contrasted with morality, usually fairness or justice. Some economic policies may be seen as increasing efficiency, but at the cost to fairness or justice. It is the classic laissez-faire versus neoliberalism argument. The question being argued is to what degree (if any) the government should be involved in economic decisions.
My brewhouse and I know that what counts is not the way our copper is fired, the noise of our boil, nor the steam we make. We know that it is the hop utilization that counts. We will hit our target O.G....
Me: So "fart" means happy?
Manufacturing & Technology News
show details 12/7/09
But all in all, I am human and this is me
But hardlinking can be hard, because unless it is done in a specific way, the web producers loses the ability to change that web page.
